Way **WAAAAYYY** up your butt Spike 
Solid comeback brosef.
It was supposed to be Ahri...........
Just a guess, but, Germany?
And the Supreme Court can't be wrong?  
I've seen this woman before, there are nudes of her on here somewhere 
That would have been a goal if it wasn't for Turris. 
I sent you a friend request, my steam name is [BDG] Wake I would like to play a few games with you, you seem really down to earth. Although im betting you are pretty swamped with requests right now. Either way I hope you can move on as painlessly as possible.
Yeah it sucked, but it was over three years ago.  I'm in a much better place now!
She's the only Khaleesi that's been featured, but there are many other Khalasars and therefore other Khaleesis. Which is probably not how I'm supposed to pluralize those words.
Can you deploy to give people 'UPGRADE NOW' pop-ups in a 50m radius?
Hi. That is a core part of the Epicurean Paradox.  http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/21tzrd/reddit_how_do_you_justify_your_belief_or_lack_of/cggw9vu
It was removed by the user for me :(
Regarding quantum mechanics... everyday life operates as a continuum. Take driving for example. As you drive out of your driveway, beginning at 0 mph, you accelerate to 1 mph, 1.5 mph, up to the speed limit, let's say 35 mph. Inevitably, you reach all speeds in between zero thirty-five, even if it's just for a moment in time. You can apply this to position, where if you move from your front door to the driveway, you essentially occupy every bit of space in between the two locations. Hopefully you see how the continuum applies to our everyday lives, in the sense that there is a continuos ability for different quantities and values to exist.  Now, as physicists began to study our everyday life very closely, at the atomic and sub-atomic levels (electrons, photons, and other tiny particles), they began to unveal quantum mechanics, or a complete divergence from this "continuum." For example, if you study the energy of an electron, it can only posses VERY PARTICULAR, quantized values. I am not knowledgeable on values and scales, but let's say an electron has 6 units of energy and it gets excited to the next energy level, which just happen to be 10, it CANNOT occupy or possess 7, 8, or 9.5 units of energy. It can only possess the quantized values, decided by nature/physics!
probably going to get downvoted for this but it's true. a childhood neighbor of mine was the real deal.  she was a real psychic.  i know this because she could blow your mind with her knowledge of you without ever knowing a single thing about you.  every time. she was well-known for donating every single penny she ever made on this talent to cancer research.  we don't know everything.  a hundred years ago you would have been laughed at for telling people about atoms.
I've read stories in some /r/AskReddit thread about parents denying their children water in favor of soda when out to eat.
It's also ~~bad acting~~ somewhat odd to look at.  in that scene, weyland didn't just look intense, he actually seemed pissed off. Pissed off while standing in a room filled with opportunity and a crowd that is hanging with baited breath at his every word. That scene made no sense...  Unless... it could be surmised, given the uneven beginnings of the applause, that many of the people in the crowd were weyland's paid shills and weyland was angry that he had to set all this up just to drum up support for his androids. Such a ludicrous, extravagant, expensive and risky move thematically mirrors his decision to take himself to the engineers world.  Well, that's my head canon now.
My first thought.
well most of it is just design and modeling, with static loading simulations. Based on what I've been reading, high CPU clockspeed is the biggest thing for modeling, and you see marginal returns on the number of cores. For the simulation, its the exact opposite. Plus as of right now, we have solidworks 2012, which doesnt support any kind of GPU acceleration/offloading. 
People thought it wasnt?
That little lady always ends NCIS...
I remember him! He did Toontown Online ...
just so you know... the bottles are $5.50 so no need to go crazy on this.  Also..they are still being sold 
Move slowly when around little people. Be calm and deliberate in your actions.
&gt;things like next-of-kin status being denied to the partners of patients in emergency medical care  Yep, I've read about the sad cases where the family of the dying person denied their son/daughter's loved ones from being at the death bed (because no legal recognition) and even from the funeral. But hey, Eich said he was sorry for the pain he caused in a press release. So it makes it all better I guess.
Having a friend who chose the easy way "out" I agree with this post 100percent..  Suicide is the cowards ways out, your life is hard enough to think about suicide? Wear a fucking helmet, if you think your life is the worst?  there is ALWAYS someone with a worse life.
You're very welcome
Yes, a NSFW tag would have been helpful.
You are indeed correct, the speed gained and lost in the maneuver is indeed equal however only in the frame of reference of the planet the maneuver is around.  From the frame of reference of the planet, the object/spacecraft approaches your planet, swings around it, the flies off at the same speed.   From the frame of reference of say the sun or some other "Stationary" observer, we see the planet has a velocity of its own! The spacecraft approaches the planet, swings around, then is flung off in the direction of the planets motion ( or thereabouts ) with the same speed Relative to the planet it had originally. In doing this it has actually "Siphoned" off some of the planets momentum ( Though like most things we do to planets it's completely unnoticeable from the planets point of view ).   This can of course work both ways, and a gravity boost or "assist" can also be used to slow a spacecraft if we come at it from a different trajectory, a process used in probe missions to the inner solar system. In these cases probe is thrown "Behind" the direction of the planets motion, and loses some of it's speed relative to the sun.
Nirvana was a big thing when I was a teenager. Also enormously baggy jeans. 
My sister got married at dodger stadium maybe 10 years ago. Apparently it wasn't all that expensive (for a 300+ person wedding), but prices today are something like 4 times as much as they were about 10 years ago. Not really certain why.  They didn't get married on the field though, and the only people that could go on the field were the wedding party, and only just for the wedding photos. Having it on the field bumps the price up *drastically*. Like a few hundred thousand extra.
No disrespect, he just acted like a scumbag in that race. Act like a scumbag, do not expect love.  A true sportsman would have refused to receive the trophy at the end of the race.  Like [Bobby Jones](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bobby_Jones_\(golfer\)#Sportsmanship). In two different occasions he called a penalty on himself, although no one else had witnessed the fault.  That's what I call a gentleman and a true sportsman.  It's not because someone is in life support that I will condone his anti-ethical attitudes.   
I wish I could get this printed as a poster :(
I dont believe it: a close friend of mine wrote a novel that is actually insanely good and well written. Who would have thought?   Its like 1984 meets Celestine prophecy.   I want to help her out so here's what i want to do:  Anybody who buys a copy through the link then emails me a screenshot of the confirmation/purchase complete page will be given 200k RDD coins (about 4.20$ worth making the book you buy $0.80 ! + you get an awesome read)!  So buy it, email me proof of purchase + your RDD coin address and enjoy! (bravenewcoin@gmail.com - use title "range of illusion")   ps - for Kindle only so far :)  pps - there is mentioned of bitcoins somewhere in there as the oppressed citizens try to fight the technocratic dictatorship haha
Suggesting or requesting that she revert the kind of content she produces isn't silencing, it's simple criticism. Gender issues has literally nothing to do with skepticism and shouldn't have anything to do with it either. It's a misplaced and misguided movement. And if you can't take people being mean to you on the internet, there's a simple solution: get off it. Acting like you're the only person who receives threats or has people writing profanity to them is ridiculous; every major youtuber experiences it, and it isn't a gendered issue. Trying to turn it into a space where people can only say things that you want them to is a doomed effort.  The thing is, I really don't like Rebecca Watson at all. She isn't a very good skeptic and uses her status to basically try to make as much money off of people as she can, like she did with that "kit people can use to test for genetic disease". She just uses her gender as a way to claim to be persecuted and insults her viewers who actually support her but don't agree with everything she says. As far as I can tell she's just a generally horrible person.
Thanks for the link. Very informative and it's good to know a bit more than "ammonia bad, cycle tank, no more ammonia".  EDIT: I'm also at a pH of 8.2 with a tropical tank, so based on the chart in your link I'm in the danger zone :/ Good thing I'm getting incredibly low readings.
"why do you think it's ok to overturn hundreds of years of judicial practice and persecute a section of society that commits just 0.4% of crime nationally? Is removing the right to free association worth it in the long run?"
Um. The top of it with the air hole covered? It's much more convenient.
&gt;O come on Willie!
Bloodseeker
I hate to say that, but if they had all died that day, today metallica would be considered as probably the best metal band of all time. 3 albums. 3 ultimate thrash classics. 
So they'll let Lance go?
make sure you get some screenshots of that shit. When she gets older, that is GOLD blackmail, and great embarrassment for wedding(s).
Has someone told you about [OpenOffice](https://www.openoffice.org) ?Works just like Office, but saves as a .odt file. Most profs can deal with that, but you can also get a program called [Pages](http://www.apple.com/mac/pages/?cid=wwa-us-kwg-mac-com&amp;siclientid=5899&amp;sessguid=fd5a3bb0-261b-4105-bc5c-c9b7f3cc3c25&amp;userguid=fd5a3bb0-261b-4105-bc5c-c9b7f3cc3c25&amp;permguid=fd5a3bb0-261b-4105-bc5c-c9b7f3cc3c25) that will allow you to save as a .doc file (which is what a Word doc saves as). I've done all of my MLIS degree on Mac and it has been no problem. 
NEEDS MORE PIXELS
It is in Florida. Close family friend of mine went through this process. 
Yea I'm sooo going to cry when I watch it later... 
Lasers? Annnd were in the 70's again..
lol...lol..lolololololoololol.  LMFAO. This thread.  ROFL.  Came back here to take a poke a around, and this thread... LMAO THIS THREAD...  aw gawd...  You know when you laugh so hard it's almost like you got winded?  Thanks for the laugh guys.  This guy just got his shit rolled by the internet lmao.  Even the betas are steamrolling him rofl and this guy is a masta beta.  LOL and now he thinks everyone has alts because they think he's an internet loser.  ROFL.  Ok ok, check it:  JSArrakis and mwofanpewpew are my alts, which makes them the best players in the game.  ggclose.  AAAAAAAAAAAAAAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA
Actually, like most of their games, Fortune and Glory has both, but also like the others, it is clearly designed around the Co-op.
Put it in the notes when you order, they might do that just to prevent the hassle of re-mailing it.
I swear Kidz Bop is Satan in his purest form.
Is it still heavy? I've heard that there can be spotting between periods when you first start taking the pill so maybe it's that
How much would one of these run me?
[Last 5 Minutes of NCIS SPOILERS] Aww, man, they killed Mo...
I like the parkour on that map, but it's damned hard to find an actual stand-up fight. It's not that fun to always get the drop on someone (or get dropped on).
32, chocolate!
They have hot peppers at In N Out? God dammit, I've been eating there for years and didn't know that
"Coffee?" *She pursed her lips, her brow furrowing with both intrigue and confusion.* "In what context?" *She cringed, left wondering why Soren might have been called over to the Military Police, and why a traded good had been involved.* "Hmm...Oh! Yeah really." *Much of her expression remained the same as she awkwardly craned her neck about.* "I will miss being stationed atop the Wall but...this is a better decision in the end I suppose." *She huffed out another troubled sigh.* "I'm surprised that so few have taken up the offer."
It says that the team is supposed to request iirc. 
When I first started playing I thought he sounded like Mickey Mouse because he says "HO HO". 
Curious, if you're voting for Catania, why even vote for the mayor?
HAhaha that is so hilarious!
That's what I tell everyone when the conversation comes to money and I say I want more than average. They look at me and the first thing they think is I'm being greedy. Maybe, but only to at some point be free of constant pressure of paying bills, saving for some shit I want etc, so it buzzes in the background while I do whatever I want.  Figured one sign you have enough in the bank is when you can go eat out in a nice restaurant whenever you feel like it, without stressing about the cost.
Your post has been removed as it either violated [Rule 1 ](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-) or [Rule 2](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_2-). Please check that your post doesn't contain the following issues:  * **Your own answer to the question goes in the comments as a reply to your own post.  Your post will not be approved unless your own answer is removed from the text box.**  * **You must post a clear and direct question, and only the question, in your title.**  * **Your post can't be specific to your situation or involve a story. Please make sure to depersonalize your question and remove any unnecessary context before posting it again.**  Use the text box to explain your question if necessary (adding context or conditions), but do not use it to share your answer, add unnecessary context to the question or include your personal story. As the submitter, your answer or story goes in the comments section as a reply to the post. This is to allow for users to distinguish between the question being asked, and the submitter's answer, when voting.  Please note - once posted, the titles cannot be edited. If your title breaks the rules, please feel free to make a new post that fits within the rules.  [**When you've removed your answer or unnecessary context from the textbox, message the mods for review and reapproval**](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;subject=Post%20Review%20Request&amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;amp;message=My%20post%20was%20removed%20under%20rule%201,%20please%20review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/21vj0h/if_you_were_a_food_or_specific_dish_what_would/) and ask the moderators to re-approve it.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wouldn't it be correct to say he helped deliver twins twice? Because each one is called a twin. I'm just trying to make sure we're making this guy sound even more awesome.
This website seems very useful to me. I was never good at describing myself but this website generates so much random characteristics that makes it easy to describe yourself better. Thanks for that :)
Thank god for the UTF8 support -- the fact that the language didn't support it in previous versions is inexcusable. 
Or just not consume CBS's content.
But she specifically asked about how it would affect her appearance. I think it was reasonable to infer that she wants changes in her appearance to be in the direction of "better"
That kid gets bitches wet
I dont think there is a single Utd fan who goes in to be honest :P
god i love that game..
I can, but the camera gives a better view, depending on the vehicle. I can also recover from a skid safely, but that doesn't make stability control unnecessary for the average driver.  Regardless, the point is that your opinion is *your opinion*. Not gospel.
I didn't realize how important it was to learn signing until I actually had a deaf customer. After struggling to communicate to her, I took it upon myself to learn a couple of signs.    There are a *ton* of videos on [Youtube](https://www.youtube.com/results?search_query=asl+for+beginners) and I came across [this site](http://www.lifeprint.com/), which is pretty much a *free* course in ASL. I still can't really sign much, but I want to eventually become fluent in ASL. 
I would gladly move to your country.
Hot spots? Walk out your door and there are literally women everywhere you go. There is no secret hot girl hangout. Some places have better odds than others such as mentioned in my previous post. Go down in flames? Move on to another one. You've been living life on easy mode to this point, and now you have to make friends and meet women all over again. Sure, it's easier with a good social circle in place, but you aren't in that situation, so do what you have to do, and work on getting a social circle.
Dual layers beeeyotch! 
Why are radians?
I'd be a slacker or a moocher because I wasn't thinking about what I wanted to be at 5. I was too busy being a dusty kid with scraped knees in a small town.
That kind of damage doesn't reverse itself on the leaf, but as you've seen the new growth is fine. Your shit looks bomb! 
Fantasy baseball is a side consideration to the fact that it's fucktarded.  
Yes I read the article, pep is the greatest because he can speak german. Did you read even one sentence of my comment?
I feel like I just looked at some sort of taboo porn that got me off too much. This is more like heaven porn than earth porn.
That quote wasn't from the developers.  They honestly believe Satan is hampering them but they acknowledged that kickstarter didn't work and that they are seeking alternate funding.  I think it's more that they acknowledge money and time are the reasons this game isn't taking off but are saying that the reasons these problems exist has to do with Satan.  I think it's unfair to say they haven't worked hard or seen why people aren't interested in their game; that's a big leap to take when the article is so slanted to insulting everything from their home town, conversion of faith, and religion.  In reality, it doesn't look like they have much of a game there.  Lack of interest is probably what has really killed it.  
That's not healthy. 
In case you're wondering about downvotes, the topic of pricing is discouraged. (Check the sidebar for details.)
Did you make it to the moon? if you make it far enough you "win" 
The decapitation was made by a chechen al nusra front
Barrett has visa issues that means he can't wrestle on television.  I agree that O'Haire never really got a chance to wrestle in his gimmick. That was an oversight - he should have been given a chance. You know how Bray Wyatt or Undertaker just wrestle their gimmick perfectly? O'Haire never got a chance. 
Yeah - you need to have a zombie cards for it to work :)
Alright it's time! Got myself some Gouda and Tantrum :P
"Thanks a lot. As if I couldn't get more addicted to this game." I said, half evil, half sarcastic.
**Bold Prediction:** We see the mother in tonight's episode
You should request a RMM page!  Let me know if you do and I'll leave a review then. :)  [Here's](http://www.reddit.com/r/RateMyMayor/comments/20zow9/painteddahlia/) my link.  Thanks!
You'll be serving pageant face in no time.
nah im pretty sure this is how they sound like
Oh wow.  The jealousy that is currently writhing within me is pretty intense.  Noice.
Now that is absolute bullshit on behalf of Square. It's still worth turning it on for the merchants, but they arent going to see any real benefit, and Square is partnered with Coinbase, so they will get to pocket the extra 1.75%. I could see it they wanted to charge 0.75% to cover the cost of the Square Market, but the same fee? Seriously? 
Here we go!
Really, neither Gen really had/has many military related things. Gen 2 had the Admiral, and this Gen we have M4. Especially now that C3 is as good as gone, the military theme really falls apart (I don't really understand how that started in the first place, to me, CCC was just a Minun, another interchangeable random team member). I just think people are trying to force the lore way too much, instead of letting it happen naturally. Most people forget that for both Red and Crystal, the lore wasn't really finalized until near the end.
You should name it Lord Helix.
It got removed :(
Such a perfect hang!
Great Community, I am in it :) Come join!
Depends on your time zone.  A week ago, I put "australian april fools' day!" on my calendar for today.
I'm a math teacher and I get to run the science lab at my school a well.  I get to pretty much do whatever comes to mind in science, and have the mathematical information to justify it.  Trebuchet?  Determine the linear feet per second by dividing the distance the grapefruit went compared to how long it was in the air.
It's 3/31 here  I don't know any jokes.
I think my mom thought they would get stolen. What she didn't know was that I was trading them. I had two blue pokemon games at one point but Idk where the rest went 
That is a pretty entertaining game, good job for your first game Shibe!
UPVOTE for being awesome.
Oh so it was all it once for DC? I think Marvel phased them out gradually.  On some characters the underwear is OK, Superman being one of them, but in general I think it is a good development.  It's just such an odd thing to do.
This is not how it works. You made the claim and I pointed how you did not provide the evidence of your claim.  I would like to see the NYT article that you claim to state that the fires never got near any trusses.  Until you do I don't have to show you anything to prove my claim.
hey LoweJ we meet in the wild!
**Update**   Hermione managed to accomplish all objectives. Zuko has returned with her as have the 6 warriors. Every nation in 34384 has agreed to full cooperation with the MP as long as we continue to use their warriors at our facility. 
+/u/dogetipbot 18.5 doge verify
probably eating better. it's good. i don't *think* i invented it
How do you throw theories out when you haven't watched the most important seasons of the show? We've met the mother. Ipso facto theory debunked.
^^shit
[here we go](http://i.imgur.com/30eEul4.gif)
Wow, I think that was one of the manliest things I've ever seen. Wow. Wow. 
Its not selfish to want your boyfriend to give you a hug and tell you he'll support you in whatever you choose.  I think that if you don't want to have a child, you shouldn't.  I would force myself to go through the pain of placing the child up for adoption rather than raise a child for 18 years.  When you say you can't justify a termination in your heart  you need to consider if its because you believe the embryo doesn't deserve to be aborted or if its because you don't deserve the abortion.  Its foolish to go through a pregnancy because you think you don't deserve an abortion because your situation isn't compelling enough.  If you genuinely believe that an fetus is a human life, that is one thing (and it is a position I can respect), but right now its an embryo.   Maybe the question to ask yourself is how would you feel if you had a miscarriage...  Edit: and I'm sorry in advance if I offended you or didn't seem supportive enough, but honestly my first reaction is that you can do so much more if you're not a teen Mom.  Please don't keep a pregnancy just because.
That's awesome!
there's also that and probably a treaty with the levamme 
not without breaking MAP, or its from the first version. 
Raptors for sure. They have a cool team.  Wouldn't be surprised to see the Bobcats do OK in the first round. Win? No probably not but surely put up a decent fight. 
欢迎光临！
This is embarrassing
Slowly is a mis-nomer. What you want is controlled descent. Don't let it just drop from the top.
Heh.
In fairness, Shadow Dance was originally a skillshot. Which would be VASTLY more broken than the current version. Can you imagine chasing that shit? She'd make Leblanc look like an amateur. 
There's an awesome club that plays out by Dulles.
Its the Union flag unless flown at sea!
Hey man, if you're at the bottom, you have opportunity to rebuild yourself. Some people are very envious of that. They work themselves in shitty opportunities. You can start from scratch. Do it right, conquer planet. 
Any reason you were trying to get speedlunky before beating the game? Just curious.
Is it not like they promised? you can just walk through the lands and do whatever you want and level up? I heard this, what you are talking about sounds exactly like every other mmo in a skyrim suit
Cerazette.
Majority of the players who play 90% of the day were at the launch tournament which started Friday. Others were watching it on twitch... I'd say a huge part of the player base wasn't playing because of the tourney, thus making low spots in the matchmaking where there were insufficient people in queue to make a match.
Yup for a while we were sharing a computer and pretty much every other day there was something new on there that came along with a bunch of "malicious software" but on the plus side I pretty much know how to get rid of any virus.
Also, if there is a free option to to create a vendor site somewhere let me know. :)
Fulminator + Thunderfury will give you a lot more proc damage while a WKL will be better for burst and hard hitting LTKs and other lightning sources.  I would think Fulminator+Thunderfury would be better for overall damage though.
I guess it's because Moe's doesn't have that catchphrase.  It's just "Welcome to Moes."
[My cupcakes &amp; cake and nail polish that my lil one brought me for my birthday! :)](http://imgur.com/GqfDACq)
Ok well I've got all from gen 1, ho-oh, lugia, celebi, regice, jirachi, rayquaza, groudon, kyogre, latios, latias, deoxys, regigigas, darkrai, cresselia, heatran, azelf, uxie, mesprit, dialga, giratina, arceus, shaymin, virizion, terrakion, cobalion, kyurem, landorus, and zygarde
I'm not looking forward to the battles, but am up for doing my share for the future generations...  Oh, and I do so love the color orange!
Hello and welcome! 
As an electronics engineer.  should this  be of any interest to me?
Wouldn't that be something
I'm glad that you failed to see the point I was trying to make.  I wasn't insulting your playstyle, or debating on which one was better.  I was simply stating that not everyone enjoys this game as you do.  You like to barely survive an onslaught of foes that threaten to break even your most disciplined men: I like to have a sort of cinematic experience, and watch as the battle lines clash.  There's nothing wrong with either way to play the game.  You seem to think that the only people who truly enjoy the game play on legendary and only go for the hardest possible challenge.  In that case, only 0.5% of us have truly "enjoyed" Rome 2, since that's the amount of people who have completed a legendary campaign at this point.  I would like to see a screencap of a legendary campaign YOU have played in which you don't lose a single army.  Otherwise, you are as mentally retarded as I am. As to the hand-holding,  I was using that as an opposite to hardcore legendary players, not as an example of how I play.   
Oh that's bad :(  Do you perhaps have house pictures of: Bob, Rosie, Purrl and Deirdre? 
This is it!
Commissary butter cream frosting and whipped icing is seriously the best out of all the big chain grocery store cakes in the area.
I would have full on conversations with myself because no one talked to me.   I still do sometimes.
I've already got a Regi. Maybe Lugia? I can give you some more Pokemon for these two if you want. I've got Hitmonchan, Hitmonlee and Tentacruel now, too.
It's always fun to go back to some of your favorite games and finally beat them.  :)
Sorry to comment in the vile "anticipate my question, hack!" style but could there have been *a word* about the existing, open for business theater that is there right now?
Nice vid. I would have just Galaxy dropped 3 squads on point and locked that place up tighter than a 19 year old nuns coin purse instead though. 
Fuck... Lol, my monitor is too bright i had tilt it to see the letters.
Alright, but that doesnt really answer my question about how would I go about making a budget team
About time they are coming out.  Hopefully not as spread apart as the NES releases were.  Just give them to us all at once.
Banned for transphobia and attacking OP.
Hi Katee!   Love what you've been doing on screen and the impact you;ve had on the sci fi genre. Since you do quite a bit of sci fi stuff I have to ask...do you actually like sci fi (since it really suits you)? 
I'm not gay but after that photo, I could be.
What the hell are you sanding for 2-3 hours? Running some sawdust factory or something?
Absolute fact here. Can confirm the air is as bad as the news says.  source: spent the last two months teaching in northern china.
Here's a chance to talk about your movie.  Do you feel that the movie has been upstaged by the acquisition of Occulus Rift by FB? Does the movie have anything to do with VR headsets?
[SnapShot](http://www.redditlog.com/snapshots/423529)  (mirror | [open source](https://github.com/mintyminer/redditbots) | [create your own snapshots](http://redditlog.com))
booo
Nice bike. I like the wheels.
Check out /r/clashofclansrecruit!
That is flat out not true. God dammit, everyone gets so fucking used to hyperbole that they start mistaking it for reality. 
So EXCITE!!
Aaaand each 4-pack costs &gt;$25.   Straya!
Nah, "fucky" is a great word. 
Star crossed homerun lovers!
Really, you need to meet the 12:00 boyz and the [Wild Out Wheely Boyz](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p1C4A-D6p1M) of Baltimore shit will blow your mind
That was the worse suit i've ever seen anyone wear on TV
GROVE STREET LIKE GTA. LOLOLOL10OLOLOL.
Correct.  He sees in OP what he hates in himself.
&gt;From HOA fees  How would a child come to be born inside an HOA without parents and be forced to remain and pay the fees? Or could you be more specific? We can go over the rest as well, I just need a little more detail. 
Then he goes to heaven. Fade to white. LOST.
*Rose comes down behind him, adjusting her school uniform and fixing her hair. She was on her way to the kitchen when she looked at the news report.*  "Hm... that's a little troubling."
Get at it brotha!
Making a real quick shout out to the submitters of this subreddit, you come up with absolute gold posts, and have made this one of the easiest subs to mod. Hats off to all of you. 
I live in Canada and my buddies went all the way to Germany for Wacken. Definitely on my list of festivals. 
1. Shot by a friendly POS.   2. Autopiloting through Gallente Space with a reputation of -8.5 3. Ditching a Tengu in WH space because I D/C'd and didn't have probes. 4. Accidentally jumping into a LowSec gatecamp, and shooting at them.
First of all, you should not put the stage in a fire lane. The tape clearly says "DO NOT CROSS". Other than that just make sure the speakers are not facing the mics. or at least try to put the mics behind the speakers, rather than in front of them.
are you serious? are you seriously serious? wtf
aaaand for a fixed tip!  +/u/corgicointip 25000 corg verify
Logical? There is absolutely zero logic in the majority of your views. Logic is based in fact. Saying things like "the gay community is only for those with sexual value", "gay death is 25", "gays are having sex at 15, used up and worthless by 30", and so on shows you have no idea what you are even talking about. Playing off of stereotypical fallacies does not make you sound logical. It makes you sound ridiculous.  And what's up with the whole "child", "kid" and "kiddo" thing? You sound not only incredibly patronizing but also majorly creepy. Do you really think this sub is a bunch of 18 year olds?  You aren't alone because you're ugly, out of shape, whatever it is you always complain about. There is no "normals vs others". There are plenty of ugly and/or fat dudes getting laid regularly or in happy relationships, even in the gay community. Your accusations of shallow-mindedness just show how horribly shallow you are yourself.  You are alone because you're pathetic and insecure, patronizing and arrogant. Your physical characteristics are far less unattractive than your personality seems to be, I don't care if you are maimed, burned and disfigured. You will continue to be an old, ugly, lonely virgin until you figure that out.   Saying you are logical isn't a catch-all excuse for being a rude bigotted asshole. You are an outcast because you choose to be.
If you're on mobile or have your CSS turned off, then yes you are. ;)
yes.  and a movie based on a comic where 4 people go into space &amp; get radiated to shit but get superpowers instead of cancer isn't allowed to have a level of silly to it?
Yep. And we're in a shittier mood than ever lately.
Pics?
Not a parent so you can ignore as desired, but why not just let the kid go barefoot and naturally build up their protection?
wow Hech making contact? I'll take it. 
I saw the abuses in place in the New London, CT Kelso case. I saw specifically how corporations were using their wealth and power to use the government system against the little guy, and the wrong decision by the Supreme court in that case. This is **exactly what would happen in a completely free-market utopia the "libertarians" espouse so much.** The biggest and least ethical overpower all. Koch mantra, and their the biggest wealthy scumbags, barring Murdoch and his ilk.  [What is currently in New London?](http://www.ij.org/kelo-v-new-london) How did the government protect the people from the corporations that abused them? But the problem isn't the government, it's that money/power/influence from corporations have infiltrated the government. Government is supposed to make it a level playing field, to oppose corporate power, allow capitalism and cometition to flourish, *but not dominate with monopolies.* Not turn into a crony capitalistic nightmare like it has for the last 30-40 years [as the average wages have stagnated.](http://www.american.edu/cas/economics/pdf/upload/2012-1.pdf) Eminent Domain used to be used for *public* projects, roads, libraries, schools; now its used to increase the tax base for a community, by giving property to rich interests against the current population.   MONEY **IN** POLITICS is the problem. Don't let some kochtopolus lead you down some bullshit path. Like the Tea Party was. 
In all seriousness, apart from the free refreshments, what makes this place better than a library? I can join my library for free and use it for free, forever - what's the advantage here?
You on X1?
Only S1 and S2 on blu ray, but you can buy the DVD box set.
All planes have something called a transponder which tells air traffic controllers where the plane is, what height, where it's headed, etc, every half hour.  This is the only official way the plane tells people where it is.  This did not go off anymore about an hour into the flight.  So that means that all the evidence they have is from things that were not designed to tell us where that plane was going. So they figured out it could have gone only two ways, north or south, and it probably didn't go north because it would have been caught on *somebody's* radar.  So they figured it went south and is therefore near Australia.  If it *is* in that area, the reason they haven't found it is because  1. It's really far out in the middle of nowhere, which means it takes forever to get there to search, and there aren't that many fishermen in that area to help out.  2. It's a REALLY big area  3. It's also a really stormy area, so that means that the debris likely is all over the place.
if only you could troll srssucks as good as intortus can.
Honestly I pretty much agree with you. Except the bird thing. I don't think you're wrong or anything, I just find it curious. Do you not like bird heads and beaks in general, or just the style in which they're generally depicted in furry art? Because I don't really know what the "flatness" is that you're talking about and I wonder if that's just an artistic thing I'm unfamiliar with. 
[Its happening!](http://imgur.com/r/ronpaulshops/vwMin)
It's definitely Google.
Thanks! No, but many of the railings have disappeared recently.
Your "philosophy" would seem to indicate that you are. The end result of your actions was the DIRECT election of the republican that advanced us militarily into Iraq and Afghanistan which is what you say you don't want.   Your "plan" will get Republicans elected and Republicans start wars.   Gosh... that seems.... "smart."  "I don't want democrats to be 'stagnant' because I don't like the US being militaristic, so I will do a thing that leads directly to the election of Republicans, who are militaristic."   Fucking brilliant.  
I was in your boat up until about a month ago. They work pretty good for what they are in my opinion, and can actually be refilled if you are interested.  That said, they don't really compare to what else is available. There are cheaper options out there that are refillable and with a bit of research refbuildable. More on that if you are interested.  They are very portable, won't leak, and actually give good throat hit and flavor.
Ha yeah. I had a guy at my local computer shop try to sell me a sound system for my computer and used that exact scene.
ITT people that don't know how to pressure well as a ranged top laner.
Yeah that's why they call him quick man. 
Dissection gives rise to delusion, delusion gives rise to dissection.
Thanks to everyone with the links for the metal options, definitely going to replace the pvc with some sort of metal. 
&gt; Demon Avenger and Xenon do more damage  Of course they do, their link skills are on constantly whereas yours is a buff.
Such a perfect term.  In Vancouver my cousin puts his empties behind his house which opens to an alley. Sometimes with a sandwich or what not.  I shit you not the bottles will be gone within 10 minutes every single time, no matter the hour.  I've never seen the people that take them either. 
Xavi won Player of the Tournament at Euro 2008, hardly a bench player. 
are you on Vancouver island? Because I got this same one today and they had a little kid dressed in a suit also trying to recruit!
Polarizing filters improve or destroy reflections giving very different sky and water images. Warming and cooling filters, fluorescent and tungsten light filters, and  gradient filters can adjust light curves before hitting the sensor giving a better histogram with more data to work with.  Diffusion and soft focus filters give physical distortions that are hard to get in post.  The results of all of them are different from processing filters. One effects the light before recording so you get all the bits of data. The other is a transformation of recorded data meaning you lose detail in the process. You may have plenty of extra detail from a high-end camera, but why give it up if you don't have to?
It's not flipped, just delayed. So adolescents tend to *biologically* want to go to bed later and sleep in later. Why? We don't know. As for a guess... well, night time provides seclusion for procreation. That's the best explanation that I've heard, but it's not really testable in any way that I can think of.
Nice try, I was watching the whole time. Your comment was still 'nice'.
thanks :D
In all seriousness, I wrote this referencing the Star Trek: The Next Generation episode where Picard is captured and tortured by the Cardassians, as well as the scene in Casino Royale (the new one) where Bond is getting tortured by Le Chiffre. I didn't have 1984 in mind while writing, but it serves as a decent homage to that as well.
FUCKING LAG &gt;
Lets be real here. The reason soccers not big in the US is because broadcasters cant play commercials during the game except for at halftime.
Trick question, what league are you playing in right now, as in this very moment?  EASHL?   Wait no.  The League of Extraordinarily Boneheaded Defensemen.
The TF could be a gun-mount that you set down.
Males: one seemingly hipster guy with no real emotion, one other feigning emotion and checking his cell phone, one very stoic looking set of forearms.  Females: all decent looking and showing real emotion, including one losing her shit.  Did the gender roles reverse at Tech?
sounds like drum and bass but at 140, really feeling this tune.  Anyone know anything similar?  Interested in mixing a 140bpm section into a liquid dnb mix if there's anything else out there.
Ahh, I remember those days. Now, NOBODY messes with me when I've  got [these bitches](http://i.imgur.com/ieyVokR.jpg) at my side.
http://imgur.com/ugEPgqd
His name is okcupiddude! What the hell did that guy think the bot was gonna pull up?  No wait, he was hoping it will pull up TRP...
I found someone else, thanks for replying though : )
I just... I love it. 
I think they did originally. I'm not sure what caused them to develop the one, though. 
Ll cool j in da armbar!
not really...
thank you :)
Hello. How do you feel about Facebook purchasing Oculus?
They're just young people, they won't be voting for us in the next election, or the election after that! They're someone else's problem.  - *LNP*
It's my opinion that it's not Half Life 3 that they are working so hard on. Gabe himself said that he already knows the ending to the series. My theory is that they are perfecting source 2. Making a new engine requires a **fuck ton** of work.  Also, when they released GoldSrc, the showed it off with Half Life, when they released Source, they showed it off with Half Life 2, so it only makes sense that they're going to release Half Life 3 along with source 2.  They can't just release HL3 without source, so once we see the release of Source 2 coming, I'm sure Half Life 3 will be right along with it.
Gravity was an exceptionally well made film. The sound was outstanding, and it rightfully won a pile of awards for its effects both visual and audio.  Problem is that your average movie or even TV show isn't nearly as well produced.
I watched it today about an hour ago. It amazes me how much Ted is the same person now as he was 9 years ago. 
http://107.155.72.213/bos_20140331/  Supposed to be an HD link  Warningthough: Boston stream , with rondo commentating 
Onion on the belt. It was the style at the time.
Not to brag but i've slept with easily 160 girls and my penis size is 9 inches.   Not bragging. 
At least yours sounds fun.
Wow, her COVERS are actually good.
That /r/elsamasterrace situation will go down in Frozen fandom history.
Tiggers love to bounce!
[Pixel Fags - Hellbenders](https://www.mediafire.com/?1bx2i38v7nijhqm)  Here ya go!  I ended up just making it loop start to finish, since the ending was too cool to cut out and there weren't many good loop points.  Let me know if you want any changes.
Already on scene.
Is Glenn Beck still on the air?  
But that is just not true, they have culpability, if not "legally". Large corporations and very wealthy influence government to create loopholes, undue regulation, misrepresent (H1b program), so they can get away with these things in the first place.  I suppose in a perfect world, money could not influence people. But people who seek power and money, such as politicians are not of that demographic.  Ultimately it is the peoples fault for not watching their government.   However, dismissing the roll corporations and the government roll in the situation is intellectually dishonest.
There out of pre orders boo
[The Australian Soprano?](http://www.anitawatson.net/Anita_Watson,_Soprano/Welcome.html) Great voice, but didn't know she was psychic.
And would remanding that society with no information lead them to becoming more moderate? Is that what has occurred in similar instances around the world?
So you not answering all the Ms./Captain Marvel questions is because you have to keep whatever is going on quiet right? Blink once for yes or twice for double yes.
I expect pretty much PKA around a camp fire and Kyle shooting squirrels. 
Mogadishu is fun to say
Really interesting listening to the commentators during off air moments. 
That last 5 minutes was some really entertaining hockey
apparently so.
Carl Sagan
I knew I was going to mess one up. They are all in my GPS, I had to remember where a couple of them are, cause this whole area is all the same to me. I have yet to have a card store I dislike within 30 minutes driving from Norfolk. There is one store that had a hammer of bogardan for $20, and other cards way overpriced, I didn't stay long enough to check out the gaming.
Is this Google's April Fools joke?
Almost poetic
You're disgustingly kinky.  
Ha, Landsale. I grew up in Horsham.
Nothing like sniping your hoped for first round pick as a way to kick off the relationship.  
how far are you from springfield/branson
And because the team is in Mexico...
Much appreciated sir, luckily I have an amazing instructor who would listen to what I have to say, then explain why his way is better or why the foreign way would also work, or why people use that and why we don't use it in class. He's a really great guy that actually want a us to learn. Off note, how do you get millwright tag next to your name? I see lots of people on here with other tags?
Or he's fucking tired.
1. Run.  2. Defend yourself with smart comments. 3. Redeem yourself with cats.  Choose wisely.
Multiple different sites. I've only scored a couple times on CL. It is really competitive. Worst is being second in line for free stuff!
I guess the guy summoned the bot, making the bot innocent.
OK, so I know the picture is blurry, but I was literally shaking from excitement!  I pulled them out, squealed, tried to focus long enough to photograph them...  and then I started swatching and playing and gave them their new home amongst my other lippies!  the Etude House one (the little silver one that is not the buxom) says "Look at" on the packaging and "My lips" on the product itself...  It is amazing!  That Tarte color has been on my list of droolworthy products...  and omg - just - ALL OF IT!  These are going to be SO loved and so used.  The Buxom was almost intimidating, until I swatched it - I am so going to wear that all the time! &lt;3  I can not say THANK YOU enough.  I was on the phone with my dad when I checked the mail...  I think I might have screamed something less than coherent and hung up on him...  might need to call him back so he is not worried...
That's pretty Badass, well done!
Went a little bit over, but this looks awesome http://www.futhead.com/14/squads/9129783/
What is the finish on Rebel?
what system definition are you using and what is your hardware?
Very happy to hear it! The first discussion with be on April 2nd, see you then!
Everything here is at an exorbitant price
You've pointed out that Nenshi has instilled a strong sense of civic pride in his supporters. I know that's just "feelings" and "emotions" but some call that "pride" or "patriotism" and that's not necessarily bad, although I can't put an objective value on it either.   As for secondary suites, I don't think there's a uniform objective acceptance on that issue yet. Property taxes are increasing, but "sky high" is a subjective term particularly for people who move here from certain cities where taxes are higher and don't get you nearly as much. The blue ring... I don't like it either, but we know who to blame for that one, right? Which is to say the people responsible for allocating the budget and selecting the artwork. But... whatevs.  As for nobody outside Calgary giving... well... I'm not saying he's universally beloved, but there are two mayors that Canadians from coast to coast are familiar with and Nenshi is one of them. In that side-by-side comparison, he's often thought of as the one you'd want to have as mayor.  I get it. I get what you're saying and I like it when people express their opinions. But can you explain your claims? The ones about his "lying ass," and him being a "fake and a fraud" so that I can get more into this discussion?
Awesome! It would be this FC: 5258-0790-5097 ^ ^
Im a dps, but heres my 2 cents.  Trinity  1. Healing is much more engaging than in previous mmo's 2. Not sure i understand the question. The game doesnt reward tanks or healers more than dps. But id assume queue times are faster. 3. Dont know if its boring, but id doubt it. They have more vital roles, so yes there is more pressure. 4. If someone leaves in the middle of a run, you requeue, just like wow. Takes longer to replace tanks and healers.  Telegraphing.  1. Yes 2. allies 1 color, enemies another 3. yes 4. Im looking at the floor, and my abilities bar, and the bosses hp bar. All three will be in a more convenient location when the new ui is released this month. Ive gotten used to it already, its not annoying.  I made a video of a boss fight in one of the level 20 dungeons. Sadly you cant see my action bar in the video, but this should give you an idea of what fights look like. Keep in mind i have ally telegraphs turned off.
Nova Launcher Prime is really nice.  Get Swiftkey and swipe your words.  Talk to your phone a lot, I press the mic button on the google search widget and tell it to call or get directions to places all the time.  Set up call and/or text widgets on your main screen for people you typically call.  Docks and drawers in Nova are handy.  I also speed up screen transitions with it, and have set swiping up to bring up my recently used apps.  Bit of a ramble I know, just streaming some thoughts about how I use my phone.
Liz I don't want to come off creepy or anything but you're so beautiful! :)
For a second i was like "hey  wait a second Im not on my naughty throwaway account"
Canada: A new economy car is around $15,000, but closer to $20,000 after licensing/taxes/etc.  Operating costs vary considerably between vehicles.  Insurance is the biggest variable.  I pay $36.00/month, some people pay $360.  It depends on the vehicle, driver experience [or lack of], location, and many other factors.  
Unlimited 4G on my phone.  Mmm dat mobile Pandora
**How do I feel?** A lot better if they make the playoffs, but in general I really like the fight I'm seeing in this club of late and it seems they are finally buying in to Mike Brown's system. To even be in contention for a playoff spot with as bad as they played to start the year is amazing.  **Like to see?** The Cavs figure out what they want to do in the front court. Small forward needs to be addressed through trades/free agency/draft, but power forward is an enigma. Thompson has proven to be a double-double guy, but only by default of eating minutes - and that is roughly 30 min a night to get 11 and 10. Brown has horribly misused Bennett up to this point (been injured for quite some time now) and needs to see the floor so we can see what he is capable of. That will give him some consistency and if he can start knocking down jumpers the floor spacing will be that much better. That leads me to center. Cleveland needs to sign Spencer Hawes long-term immediately. The guy is a defensive liability, but he can shoot/score and his ability to space the floor has opened up the offense dramatically.  **What didn't I like?** In a nutshell: Andrew Bynum, players not buying in to Brown's system, Waiters NOT STARTING FOR GOD KNOWS WHAT REASON, media making drama about 'locker room' stuff that doesn't exist and Kyrie being uphappy, ill-timed injuries, and the fact our front office is letting LeBron's impending decision effect our future. We should have thrown a ton of dough at Al Jefferson last year (steal of the year bobcats!!)
Well it gives you some karma when you catch all wild and then release them again if you already have one caught and stored in pc. Even with only battling trainers you can still level up a decent amount before heading to gyms :)
*he nods and pulls you into a hug*  I'm sorry Nira... I'm sorry. 
It's called pro choice, not pro baby murder. It's not as if she is a vegan who has abortions on the regular, she just supports the right for a woman to chose what happens to her body and her quality of life.
Sea bass. 
If this were me, I'd be concerned that her expectations were different from mine. Is this crazy fun party antics, or crazy fun relationship-starters? I think you guys need to discuss that. You can probably just ask her if she wants to stick to fun hot tub stuff, or if she is interested in/okay with there being more continuity in terms of who else is involved than one-offs, and/or if she is interested in relationships as well as fun sexy times.   You might start by telling her your fears, and asking her to talk through it with you. See where the conversation goes.
Steve Nash?
Police officer. By day, I fought crime and by night I wrote up my reports on a little kid typewriter.  Now, I write up reports about noncompliances and deviations from regulations but certainly don't get to pack a weapon or know any crazy martial arts tactics. 
HUZZAH GOALGGGGRRRRR  Also who are the asshats talking over the game? This is not what I want to hear.
What's it like to be the newest disciple of GabeN?
If they live in a state a state that didn't accept the Medicaid expansion they fall into the gap. Too rich for Medicaid, but too poor for subsidies because there's a bottom end income limit that the Medicaid expansion would have fixed.
maybe GI Bro could enter the ARMBAR. America's favorite hero. And the look Booker shot to Riley was not too pleasant. 
Hahaha! Yes, I thought she did a really good job too. And thank you so much for the comments, I truly appreciate it. I consider myself lucky to be able to live every day with the opportunities and the means to do the job that I love and also try and be as charitable and empathetic as possible to the world and all its creatures. 
I still haven't seen that movie...should I?
Obligatory CENA HEEL TURN IMMINENT
There are good ones.  The ones who say up front "cyber only" are fine with me.  It's the ones who try to fool the IRL people who are the assholes.
Crimea is now celebrating "We love the ~~King~~ Prime Minster Day!"
__^[wow ^so ^verify]__: ^/u/voxic11 ^-&gt; ^/u/AcidDrinker __^Ð88.50000000 ^Dogecoin(s)__&amp;nbsp;^__($0.0450163)__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/dogetipbot/wiki/index)
That's true, though I think a court would likely find that the intent to harm was not there.   What is it if you do something stupid and someone unintentionally gets hurt as a consequence? 
gn2 mid? What world do you live in?
I did a little looking into the links and found something rather interesting.   "he said this route of exposure could make it harder to contain and to track the outbreak, because it was not concentrated in any one social or cultural circle, as contagious diseases often are."  This is in the link to the article about the New York City outbreak. Seems the evil vaccine dodgers were not to blame in this case. It may have been other non vaccines people. Or perhaps the high numbers of immigrants had something to do with it. However the entire article leads you to believe that the schools with people that are not vaccinated are the cause of the outbreak. It appears this is not the case. So basically it is a fear mongering piece to demonize those that refuse vaccines. While I personally am vaccinated, and will choose to vaccinate my own children I also respect the fact that some do not want to, and it is not my right to force them to do so. I know it is dangerous, and risks the health of a the sickest in our population, but its a dangerous world. They are all still at a far higher risk of getting sick, or being killed by thousands of other things. Don't get me wrong it is something we need to educate people about, but we cannot force them to do it either way. What I don't like is that the lobby for vaccine manufacturers and those that stand to make a lot of cash are out there pushing stories like this that seek to make my mind up for me, and make me believe that we should mandate vaccines. Of course I am not that gullible, but the point is we have a government that spies on our every action, thought, and written word. A congress that does nothing but serve its rich masters. A media that seeks to forward that agenda, all the while trying to influence the way we think about issue. Particularly ones that make the machine a lot of money. I am not ok with all of that. I am not doing anything wrong so I do mind you looking. I am a living breathing person, a corporation is not. This government derives its just power from the consent of the governed. Not the crown, and certainly not the corporation. I am an adult, I can think for myself, make my own decisions and weigh my own risks. I do not need the government or the corporate machine to do my thinking for me or to influence my decisions. 
Not that but it's a school night and it's already late she's gotta go home right after 
there's a red miata i see occasionally with tags that flat out says "66 suks" 
I agree, move the file into Ps and create your text layer, it might be easier to transform if you rasterize the text layer first. 
Squees abound, is that a Maine Coon?!
Just looked at a can, one can is one serving and it's 12 oz.
I drink the monster lo carbs daily and haven't had issues. I make sure I include calories in my total.
It is. I own it and watch a few times a year.
My sister-in-law seems like the kind of person ballpark proposals were invented for (awkward sentence). She loves baseball, has season tickets, knows some ballpark personnel, and doesn't mind being the center of attention. And even SHE has said she would not have been okay with a ballpark proposal. So yeah, you have to be careful with that junk.
Ur all negus peanstns. #NokiaMasterrace
You can either get a nemesis clone (aim for the higher quality ones) Or an MVP 2.0, which is pretty good for low-key, it'll last a while, has good battery life, and you can still use RDA's on them from 1.5-2 ohms.  Just depends on what kind of mod you'd like to own, really.
Listen. Kyle. Me and Kenny don't give two shits about some stupid ass *whales!*
This comment is delicious. &lt;3
there is also a vastly overlooked and really rather cheap one that is Speyburn 10. for +/-$30 it is a great daily sipper. classic speyside. fruity and just a touch oakiness. does it compare with malts twice the price? no, but for a daily sipper that is easy to find and cheap to replenish its good value. 
Peanut butter, milk, chocolate syrup, oats, blender. Will taste good, I guarantee it.
Sorry for the confusion, the track that plays is "On Fire" not "Stole The Sun" even though it's listed as "Stole The Sun". I'm very confused. I purchased the album off iTunes mere hours after it was released.
Hi, I'm thinking about becoming vegan, *how do I do it?*
Oh man, I was gonna ask this. I would kill (re: pay) for a Ms. Marvel make up box!
and btw thanks so much! :) 
* [playlist for videos](http://radd.it/r/juggalo/comments/21vipi/video) in this post ([mobile](http://m.radd.it/r/juggalo/comments/21vipi)) *^Downvote ^if ^unwanted, ^comment ^will ^be ^removed ^if ^score ^is ^0.*   [^about ^this ^bot](/1vjdw9) ^| [^recent ^playlists](/r/radditplaylists) ^| [^plugins ^that ^interfere](/1m21ku) ^| [^request ^blacklist](/message/compose/?to=radd_it&amp;subject=Please blacklist&amp;message=Please add me to the /u/PlaylisterBot blacklist. You can find my favorite pic of Emma Watson at: )
Remember the last time someone posted this? Pepperidge Farm remembers.
Here are teams that could use an upgrade at starting point guard:  Indiana Pacers - Cap space will be used on Lance Stephenson  Miami Heat - No cap space if the big 3 come back, Mario Chalmers will  be a free agent  New York Knicks - No cap ever  Dallas Mavericks - Just signed Jose Calderon for 4 years, have 1st rounder Shane Larkin as backup  Sacramento Kings - Isaiah Thomas is a free agent, probably won't have cap space unless Rudy Gay opts out (lol)  LA Lakers - Have a hurting Nash, only have about 25 million to spend on everyone but Kobe, Nash, and Sacre  Milwaukee Bucks - Have Brandon Knight (8th overall pick from a couple years ago) + many much bigger issues to fill.  Orlando Magic - Jameer Nelson will (most likely) be a free agent, and will have lots of cap space. If they don't see Oladipo as their long-term option at PG, they look like the only real threat to sign Lowry.  TLDR - If Lowry wants to get paid and start, his only real options are Toronto and Orlando (Or a sign and trade of course)
I doubt his comment originally said that
You insignificant piece of ingenuity, how dare you insinuate that I would tolerate such a diabolical insult from someone whose mental capacity predominates that of a rock.
EoC was game changing.  There were quite a few people, myself included, who quit due to EoC.  I quit long before EoC was released because I knew it was coming and I felt any further progress would be futile.  In late 2013 I came back and gave it a shot.  I'm glad I did, because it's worlds better than November 19th, 2012.
open, just drop in front of station
Because decades of sub-inflation increases have dug them a massive money hole. Canada Post is a business. They have a duty to their shareholders to stay solvent.
*Moves to hide behind a tree*
Personally i can't stand the op song lol but i love the show for what it is, which really isn't much.
I see. That makes perfect sense.  Although, am I wrong to say modern Italians have a claim as the descendants of Rome as modern Chinese today claim to descend from ancient China?
Pork chops, yo
1 día = 24 horas  1 mes =  720 horas  1 año = 8640 horas  So, básicamente, reducimos en más o menos un 0.01% del consumo total? Me parece una boludez muy bárbara, pero ojo que se ve en cosas similares también. La única forma de contribuir con una causa es con el hábito, no haciendo patria una vez por año.
i do not think it means what you think it means
I liked it :) The quality of the f2p editing looks as good as it used to. Hooray
Shit the bed. I failed on like, 4 counts. 
How nice they are to others 
Do you want ladybugs?  Cause that's how you get ladybugs
Thank you.  Or that the solution is to just let several billion people die an agonizing death within the same short time frame.  The impact of a massive die-off would be worse than if they kept on living!
There's a type of java fern called windolev aka lace leaf. It looks like [this](http://plantedtankworld.com/2014/01/15/lace-java-fern-and-wood-2-11-gallons/). Haven't seen the effect mentioned here though. 
Yes sir! Thank you adding you now
[TRIGGER WARNING: MALE]  EFS, I would like to cut off my penis but I don't think I can bear the physical pain that will cause me.  Would you hold me down and do it for me please?
heatclub.com - the occasionally will have Supreme stuff up, but it's a lot of BAPE.  (I'm actually curious if anyone has ever picked anything up from them before, I heard they were very legit - i'm curious about shipping times, stuff like that, some things seem to sit for like a year.)
My county doesn't have a low cost spay program. When the large group of them were coming regularly we weren't able to touch them. We would have had to trap them and if we had animal control would have put them down. In the end, that's exactly what my neighbor ended up doing.
Are outdoor cars really that bad for the environment? Sure, they kill birds and mice but don't those animals usually have lots of babies because they die at a high rate anyway? Seems like the circle of life. Idk, it just seems cruel to keep a cat inside always.
This post was removed because it didn't contain your Friend Code in your flair. Please [Insert your Friend Code in your flair](http://friendsafaribot.tumblr.com/) and try again. **Important:** However, if you have already set up your flair recently, it might take a while before it shows up and the bot recognizes it, which might take anywhere from 5 minutes to a couple hours or more. So if that's what happening, take 15 minutes out, sit down and enjoy a nice cup of tea. Cheers!  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Ffriendsafari) if you have any questions or concerns.*
A song by Metallica 
Oh haha
Slavery is neither supported or reprimanded. However, the relationship between master and slave, as well as man and wife, are clearly spelled out.
The problem is that the majority of players who just ground attack are being absolutely useless. They are almost always just fodder for any enemies who are also low and rarely even provide the value of dragging down enemies who did go to some sort of altitude.  There are some planes that were better at say below 3k than above it, like the LaLas, but War Thunder doesn't reflect this very well (LaLas seem to have no problem climbing up to ~6k and out turning people up there). 
They look longer than Ladybirds here. Either they are more round in the UK or I just don't see them enough to have a good sample size.
Not confirmed, but pretty fucking obvious.  COMIC SPOILER[](/s "Rick's last line in the episode is ripped from their encounter with the hunters in the comic book.")
Melissa Sue Anderson from Little House on the Prairie
I think it's 3-4 days in the blood stream.
I am assuming that [this](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/3in0v) is a joke, correct? (I'm not good at things.)
I had a 1990 prior to this one, which didn't fare as well... if I recall it got to 280k-ish... I am not the original owner of either one.  However I've had this one since somewhere in the 280k range...  Running a little noisy (since the moment I got it 5 years ago) but generally still going strong. The AC is dead, but that seems to be something that goes early on in any car.  No major replacements on this one, yet!
It is. That and I grew up speaking french along with my english so it's a pretty commonplace word for me :D 
I guess you learn something new every day! Thanks!
I don't think the unusual aspect of this video is the incident in T1; that crap happens all the time in Rookie racing.  However, the dude who goes flying off at the start...that is unusual. lol  I wonder if he even had his hands on the wheel when he mashed the gas as you guys went green.
I wove these scarves on a 12 harness table loom. Images 1, 3, and 5 are made Caron Simply Soft yarns. The second scarf is a a mixture of bamboo, wool, and a mystery yarn that is probably an acrylic blend. Scarves 4 and 6 are wool and bamboo blends. 
Internet balls
take it out of security's budget
No, nobody.
[ +/u/dogetipbot 10 doge]( http://media3.giphy.com/media/KBfKueAjIJV8Q/giphy.gif)
What a cool guy, thaanks!
I think that you would have a good chance if you can somehow get back in and get your Masters so you can go through recruiting season again with Beta Alpha Psi. Otherwise try and get a CPA if possible so that you will be more competitive to the public accounting firms.  I *think* government workers can have a laziness stigma but I think that if you show them your efforts in work ethic and adding as much education/certifications as possible they will see the initiative.
Thank you Da_Car, the nerve of some people!
Wow, that never even occured to me. Amazing. Have an upvote! 
I just wish conservatives could articulate *WHAT* they want America to be outside of generalized slogans.
... if committed and loving relationships recognized by the community and blessed by religious leaders constitutes "madness", the definition of the term has been significantly relaxed.
Ohh men no one saw that im from Eu and i voted both just log in and select Eu and your language then select North America and English language u will be able to vote two regions. Thank you.
Pretty disappointed in this mode. Back in titan mode, even if the Titan was able to be bored, you had a chance to prep to defend, now you really cant.  Once the hull is open, all caping stops.
They manufacture it.  They licensed it from finland to produce it here in the states
Imagine What you will be able to do with the arm pack that includes the new engines
What an asshole!!
the boundry you refer to first, the observable universe? im extremely visual, and im having trouble visualizing this being the case. how is the boundry of our observable universe, the big bang? is that the light that has reflected back at us since the big bang?  why would the universe stop growing if it started at one point? isnt there a conservation of momentum here?
That is perfect.
What college are you thinking of going to? (I'm assuming you're going to college)
Everyone dies and I take over Panem.
I'm exactly the same! Been a fan of Massa since 2007 but I quite like Bottas too. It's actually bothering me more than it should. 
Who hacked into my alt account
I'll take it!
Not working for me either. Maybe they were adding something (for april fools' day?) and something got screwed up?
Wanna impress me build a Johnny 5.
So you come on here and post a screenshot of the first 20 odd fucking lines and expect an answer? 
I wish a wrestler would guest star on one of these NCIS episodes.
what if youre using the bat signal tho
They might not be looking at the bottom line today. Low margin retailers have incentives to promote bitcoin for the long run.
Freedom of Speech =/= Obligation to upvote.
Ici. J'habite Indiana, le capital des francophones du monde
Gyms primarily exist in modern civilized countries because a lot of people are a lot less physically activate than we used to be in the past, in the past you often had to walk long distances to get anywhere and probably also had a job that was quite physically demanding compared to a lot of the jobs available in modernized civilized countries today.  The fact that we have access to far more and far less healthy food also contributes to the need of gyms and the like.
Ok thanks so much! :)
updated!
I quit cold turkey from a pattern of binging and steady but light weekday drinking. I am going to reintroduce wine and very limited beer with meals eventually.  (I was going to give it a month but after reading justsmurf's comment, I think 90 days might be better)  My problem has always been with binge drinking..  getting out of control and going on benders for days.  I am cheap enough to not drink multiple bottles of $20+ wine.  Ill have my glass with my food and be done with it... that might not be realistic.  I might be giving myself too much credit but I am going to try at least once.  Everyone is different, find what you need for yourself (people here are very helpful)
I believe that there's a slight problem w/ the rights to characters from "Silence".. I hope that get cleared.
That happens to me when I drink a lot of diet mountain dew. Also, a lot of men experience this if they urinate soon after masturbating. At any rate, spread out the water more. Carry it with you to class/work, try to drink at least every 15 minutes, even if it's just a little. 8x8 is not enough imo. I carry a 32 oz bottle around with me and try to Dragon it 3-4x a day, more if I work out. Pro tip, keep water by your bed and force yourself to drink at least 1 cup first thing in the morning. Important, but you will love yourself for it.
+/u/dogetipbot 13.37 doge xD
I'm pretty sure people are happy you don't talk to them again. This is stupid. 
There's gonna be storyline DLC right?  right guys?
Not only was this joke weaksausce, the delivery was horrible. Downvote to oblivion it shall be. 
1) Thank you 2) The body odor it turns out...wasn't actually happening. So an employer can think it's a medical condition and suspend you for it without there being a medical condition? Like you can just make shit up? That sounds so fishy.
Tv shows should use his laugh for their tracks.
A strawberry daiquiri that used cheap rum on a Caribbean island on my 18th birthday. My next one was a beer, and then I tried vodka, and then hot sake, and then a ton of mixed drinks.  It was an all inclusive. Best birthday ever.
I'd like to think that's why the Titans eat humans, to absorb their hair to improve their own. They are on a never ending quest to look *fabulous*. Truth be told, I don't think there is an answer. 
[Here you go!](http://www.amazon.com/Microsoft-Xbox-Wireless-Receiver-Windows-Pc/dp/B00E0OB7MW/ref=sr_1_2?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1396310360&amp;sr=8-2&amp;keywords=360+pc+wireless)  I'd advise not getting a cheaper version. I had one and it kept cutting out.
and so it begins...
Lol jams shorts is a brand, theyre super rare and sell for a shitton on ebay, i've been trying to find a pair for forever
"This is my first time posting here.  Who wants to see the inside of my colon?"
My little *THRONEY*  Not even sorry.
This makes me so happy! The grunts are the best! 
It's the scripting language all web browsers use. Without it, pages would be much less dynamic. Eich invented it.  Edit: if you want to see what the web looks like with script off, there's a plugin (for, er, Firefox) called noScript that makes it easy. The Chrome equivalent is apparently ScriptSafe, although I haven't tried it.
Better put on your...  ( ∙_∙)   ( ∙_∙)&gt;⌐■-■   (⌐■_■)  ...swimming trunks.
I've heard it used this way in the US many, many times as well.
I chuckled
dont even think about it twi......
Are all these photo's from the same timeframe? My average rating from all the photo's is about 6-6.5 anyway, because there is a lot of variation between them all.
It's been a wild ride everyone.... TO A GREAT EPISODE!!!!
Healing earrings this week due to it having both DET and SS, on tuesday i'm getting healing hands/belt.   Probably belt because atm I only have heros belt and don't feel like farming turn 4 anymore.
http://imgur.com/KTkvdDU
Phone wallet and shaving cream for women's legs.
I am currently 2-3 years into trying to fill a 12 pack with bottle caps, I think i have to spread them out and seem how many different caps there are now!
Absolutely gorgeous!
Ok, I will give you some fun card ideas maybe, but it would help if you said what kind of feedback you wanted.  e: You might think about Sanguine Bond somewhere in the deck. Also, Crypt Ghast is fun alongside Debt to the Deathless.
стать [медведь.](http://www.allmystery.de/i/tc9940b_russian_bear.jpg) стать [кошка.](http://ic.pics.livejournal.com/zoffoli/49796054/14924/original.jpg)
I've met him a few times and while I definitely won't say he's racist he does seem to carry a big fucking chip on his shoulder.   He ordered Sushi while doing a color grade (color correction) at one of my old facilities and when he didn't get good enough fish sauce with his order he lost it. He was massively degrading to people that were just trying to make sure he was fine and okay and and happy.   I think he just truly gets lost in his words and actions without fully comprehending them or their affects.   I mean, it's cool that he can move to some place nice that he can afford, but why can't others, who are priced out, move to a place they can afford even if it's not so nice? Shouldn't we all be trying to keep our heads above water and not live paycheck to paycheck? 
What do you mean?
I missed a zero, but even missing a zero it looks really bad. 
add me? 
You could be right, but all I could gather from the chart that it was at the beginning of an influx in general. Do we have further demographic breakdown somewhere or did I miss it on there? 
This is such a wonderful assessment of the nature of breaking the meta.  I've been on all ends of meta-breaking and although it can be fun, it can be quite terrible to play with as well.
If only that fish had fingers.
Thanks!
Actually, I'm almost certain that reddit news and reddit is fun came before reddit sync. I don't know what Alien Blue is like, but my guess is that RS, RN and Flow took their design cues from there.
Coffee is rather punishing at times, but the relief is so nice. 
That, sir is an insult to donkeys.  They would never sink so low as to let "Friends" felate them.. Even in Tijuana.  They got standards.  That show sucked, just not donkeys.  Perhaps rabid geriatric squirrels.
An Israel/Palestine joint bid.
I'm apparently a weirdo, but I prefer BeyondPod over Pocket Casts. 
Haha thanks, no worries though its just imaginary points
Cocaine
Not liking computers was cool.  Fortunately, I saw where things were headed and basically said fuck that.  You think I'm joking? There were 2 people in my Pascal computer class as a junior. TWO. (Notably, one was a girl.)
So much muscles
Do you see how fast a champion went from being lackluster and only ok to been considered broken? That's why I am glad in some ways riot take a long time on some changes, it was similar to Yasuo day 1 people considered it trash and it had buff coming in the 2nd week of it's release. Well then it was open to be played on LCS and the rest is history.  Honestly people need to stop been so stuck up with the pro level balance and jumping on band wagons and just give things a try, Shit if you want some help, just pick Thresh top and go AD, watch as people have no idea wtf to do vs you and you half hit them late game. Will never work in competitive play, works perfectly in gold and below elo
Not all of the sets from past years are up either. Only 26 sets from the past 3 years are available. 
I have never seen a shiny Pokemon... (╯°□°）╯︵ ┻━┻
Yes, VoS is safe. They are complying with all the regulations, which is why they need so much info.
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/terrorism  I see nothing that prevents that label. What is this "technicality?"
Party we will throw now by the game ,Nate dogg and warren g
I just got over the scene in arachniphobia, now this!
Pogs. Not even Alf pogs.
Fuck. That.
Brad Maddox is the Pull Out King 
because pummeling things with your fists feels THAT good right?
Now I feel bad for assuming it was the image of an old fashioned abortion.
Last night at about 2 am I launched into a rant about this. Makes me feel better to see that other people agree. This shit sickens me. 
Then stop trying to consul me. 
Game has an awesome quest system that keeps you focused on the task at hand and stages the progress so it feels like you're discovering something.   It has a horrible end game where you have to actively fail the heroic dungeons because your gear is just not up to par until all the earlier bosses drop enough items or tokens so you can gear yourself out. Also half the stats mean nothing.   Writing is awesome though. Illuminati sound like hollywood agents. Dragon has what my friend calls "chunnibyou syndrome" and horrible Naruto costumes. Templars has a grandma that has a hard time handling technology.   I was looking to get this cause even buying the base game again it is still cheaper at this sale price than buying each issues on its own. 
Added you!
Commenting to say I participated in the finale.
we use a homebrew setting, so he's deciding to make him a disciple of "the long forgotten god of sunlight". But I'll take a look at the class to see if I can use it.
You want the starters shiny or non shiny? Sorry for the stupid question but you didn't specify
Someone needs to face swap nice cage on her.
Thanks for the reply, it was really informative. I never really thought of playing against people's lack of knowledge about their own decks. It's interesting that brews are inherently weaker than T1 decks on equal footing, but I guess if it was just better than it would already be widely played.
The same one you *should* be playing in.
So many people in this thread are either fucking retarded or are playing into the joke really hard.
If only B.C. were part of Canada and could see some of those benefits.
http://puu.sh/7Rotw/cc4354e626.jpg
AndRe the giant Memorial BAttle Royal
All add me :D
I've lived in Jacksonville, it is pretty shitty. 
^__[Verified]__: ^/u/Zyrillus ^^[[stats]](http://www.reddit.com/r/corgicoin/wiki/stats_Zyrillus) ^-&gt; ^/u/MNIskrillex ^^[[stats]](http://www.reddit.com/r/corgicoin/wiki/stats_MNIskrillex) __^K25 ^kiloCorgiCoins__&amp;nbsp;^__($0.0000)__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/corgicoin/wiki/index) ^[[global_stats]](http://www.reddit.com/r/corgicoin/wiki/stats)
Id be in engineering school, because I wanted to design cars.  Still kinda wish I did that...
Check out this playlist. I've got ten just like it, hope you enjoy https://soundcloud.com/dkleckner88/sets/soul
It's Brendan Eich.
Actually, assault rifle is a legitimate weaponological term. I beleive the requirements are:   Full sized rifle   Capable of full auto   Fires intermediate rifle round
Which one is your sister?
&gt; It's too bad how we have learned nothing from that part of our history  Because it isn't taught that way.
I'm a girl, but I had to jump in seeing someone else from the area! The grape Albanese gummis are my favorite thing in the world and I love that I can buy a bag of just those without having to get a big mixed bag to pick them all out. 
Ok, thanks!
If my dog had a face like yours I'd shave his ass and train him to walk backwards.
It sure doesn't give many details regarding what was said and in what context.  I was hoping by reading that, I'd gain some actual insight, but I learned nothing from that lawsuit.   Anyhow, thanks for posting the link.
+/u/dogetipbot 81.24 doge verify
Every gym after the first 8 works like the Battle Frontier. 
Have you met Ted?
I've never listened to any headphone that didn't sound at least a little bit better from ANY sort of amplification. So if you don't mind dropping the scratch go for it.  
Welcome!  I'm 21, live in the wonderfully boring state of New York, have a husband, no kids, and have also unfortunately not won the lotto.   What's your favorite TV show and book?
Don't trouble yourself. In all honesty, I was just taking the chance to whinge. I find having a person in a photo of a beautiful natural thing like this just kind of ruins it.
And that is immediately contrasted with their successful tactics and exploits. Victories with women in their "pick up games" are told in explicit detail so that others may follow the examples.   You know, because all women like to talk about chick flicks and can be read for sexual advantage. The subreddit is all about taking advantage in all relationships. That's the long-lasting investment.
Thanks.  In the event that people do want some sprucing, my vote is for it to be mild in appearance and scope.
Thank you! It's scary and exciting. Not to get all spiritual, but I feel like I'm being guided by something.  Most likely, blind stupidity.
Climbing on things and knocking stuff over.
And this is called "mirroring". 
Fiberglass can loose its shape like that and not shatter or break?  wow.  I'm really surprised the props survived that. :)
April Foolery is getting out of hand.
This.
It is from Google.
I too am lithuanian.  Lietuva blet
I should be pushing an update in the next few days. I believe the problem is because it can't handle international characters for some reason.
I don't agree with this. I've had my biggest chest I've ever had doing strictly pushup and arms for that matter. You have to do high reps. I was doing push ups to absolute failure for ten sets with two min rest in between. As long as your form is right and taking it to failure, you'll see gains. 
People are so ridiculous. Let us not forget that it was not that uncommon of a stance to take 6 years ago (obviously because it passed.) We're going to be on this planet for a long time with people who at one point in time opposed gay rights; get over it. We are on the way to winning, so let's not make spiking the football a normal thing to do.
...but what if my natural self drinks a lot? ;-) 
Super cute girls, check. Spock and Liazrds, check. This photo is by all means awesome. 
Likewise. I'd love to give back to our online community
What am I looking at? Certainly nothing WTF, it seems.
soooo your telling me you think the prop guys said he you know what should go here?? a fire hydrant!! I guess that makes more sense then there just being a hydrant on a road where they are filming
Dat day der!!! Jerz!!
Also, didn't rick recognize bob's pants from earlier when they were still walking in the trap? now it clearly shows him wearing pants too..
Plusle: McMurdo Station, Antarctica
A lot of it is only because most births in the developed world take place in hospitals, so medical attention is close at hand. What rate of injury would you accept as sufficient to justify a reasonable fear of injury?
How is this needs an explanation? NT says he shouldn't be alienating people who disagree but find ways to persuade them, RD says that it's better not to bother, they can just fuck off
Which one is that?
Call up your financial aid counselor. Plenty of people go to top 10 schools and deal with the consequences of the financial burden. You are lucky that you got one year for free.  Your grant situation may suffer this year because your parents may claim you as a dependent for 2013, nothing you can do about it now. But let them know you plan to file your own taxes for 2014 and that will open up your options for grant money and other lending options for your Junior and Senior year.   If you can't handle the debt or don't want to take on that debt, I'm sure plenty of other schools would be happy to take you. You are an ideal transfer candidate. Let's assume you go on a mission so your parents will give you the money to complete your education. Who is to say that they won't control your life in an equally catastrophic way once you return? Maybe they will change their minds and force you to attend BYU-I. Don't negotiate with terrorists. 
Just a bit concern why is this publish now. Such a sensitive time for this to be post. Hope it isn't just a joke from Rito to get our hopes up and crush them.
All joints are going to burn too quickly for this.   Seriously, you should buy or make a pipe (Google "apple pipe" and/or see the sidebar), just load a small amount (like a pencil eraser-sized nug, then grind or chop or cut it up), and take your one hit at a time. Otherwise you will either be burning up a lot of expensive weed or inhaling too much to save it :-)
Destiny's Child, camo, rhinestones, and visible bra straps. For best results, combine all 4. 
You can join my "I'll start tomorrow" diet.  I've been on it for years.
DENVER YEEEAAAHH
Yup, but not much if they're looking for clean noise (without splashing)
Last thing I watched was Magi... Aladdin is gonna kick some zombie ass.
I'm calling a Val Venis return for WM XXX
I thought *any* printed material was seditious.
That has "What-if?" written all over it.  Ha!
Two minors incidents that are only marginally MMAR and that's why they change the laws in such a clumsy, stupid and arbitrary way that a judge put the breaks on?  Yes, that's pretty much the perfect model of a talking point.  Also, you keep trying the condescending thing? You can't quite make it work so probably should give it a rest.
Dome has almost the exact layout as Strikezone if you think about it. Same routes and everything.  Edit: I forgot, Nadeshot actually did a video on this https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZXWdGeaX_JM
Thank you! Great minds ...
Painting guardian set: Aldia's keep NG+  Catarina set: Soldier's rest NG+  Havel's set: The gutter  Brigand set: no man's wharf  Wanderer set: Swordsman class  Dingy set: black phantom at the bottom of the majula pit NG+  Hard leather set?: Pate's armor looks like this  Knight set: Majula merchant  Elite knight set: majula merchant  Leather set: soldier's rest  There is a new shadow set but it looks nothing like the old one: NG+ flexile sentry assassins  Steel set: memory of orro  Can't think of anything else right now
Well that ball isn't going to go into the Liverpool net by itself
they sound great, worth the price tag (for me, anyways)  not quite as comfortable as my 558's, but easily the most comfortable on-ear headphones I've ever worn  build quality is excellent  more punch to the bass than my 558's, and they deliver well in the most [important test of all](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=moSFlvxnbgk)
Regardless, this model is almost exactly the same as the fan art, whereas the fan art looks quite different than the official concept art.  [Official concept art for reference.](http://i.imgur.com/PppjdDM.jpg) It's still a very well made model though. 
The water is a lie.
Focus on beating Oregon...... focus on beating Oregon.....focus on bea-  Wtf Stanford go away ._.
I didn't put them through anymore turmoil. They just sat there until my dad cleaned them up the next day :(
Do you get drug tested?
Sure it'd be awesome, but I have a hard time believing that he considers Milan a top club right now.   If we had money I could see it happen but we won't attract him with just our history and our guaranteed playing time. 
That doesn't mean we shouldn't criticise it.  Hell, why not criticise Lenin, too?  Why not the Revolution?
I am going to admit that a Monarchy is better than the degenerate mob rule of the democracy.  (Constitutions don't really mean a damn)  &gt;large regions had no noticeable government  any in specific?
i love the charge rifle.  hitting pilots with it is pretty satisfying.  i also love challenging the people that use it. there was one game where i was in a titan on demiter, and a pilot was trying to get me with the charge rifle. we played cat and mouse for a good minute; he could never get my shield down fast enough and it is insanely hard for me to hit pilots with the titan's railgun. i was working on getting gen 4.  i know you don't have to hit pilots with it to get gen 4, but i couldn't let his charge rifle go unanswered.  after about 20 exchanges, i finally got him with the railgun. it was fun going back and forth, but that was probably one of the most satisfying kills i've ever gotten.
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/culture/books/booknews/10367457/Roman-roads-were-actually-built-by-the-Celts-new-book-claims.html  There are more than a few historians who claim otherwise.   As well as Caesar when describing the higher quality roads he encountered during his conquests of Gaul.   http://homepage.eircom.net/~archaeology/road.html  Not sure if these guys are legitimate sources though. 
As I pointed out, progression from the lower wn8s is really just knowledge of the game mechanics. Learning all the general weakspots and specific unique weakspots of certain tanks. Learning the maps and which ridge can be used by different tanks. Where should heavies go? Meds? TDs? Which part of the map is useless (Beach on South Coast)? Why is it useless? Where can you get firing lanes? Which spots are safe against different arty (Low arc vs high arcs). Making it a habit to sidescrape when turning a corner instead of just poking out. Learning not to side scrape when you have weak side armor, like the 50100's side gets overmatched by 120mm guns. Like Kraft said on another reply, you have to keep questioning yourself. Why are you doing this? Why aren't you? Is this the right decision? Keep doing it in the game and you'll start to understand more. Contrary to popular belief, unicums don't always rage. We just rage when pubbies refuse to learn. If you message me after the game why I told you to do this or go there, I'd be more than happy to explain.
"Accidentally."
Don't ask questions that can be answered by a simple yes or no or any other very short answer (e.g. Q:''what school do you go to''? A:''UCLA'', end of convo) Try to ask more engaging questions that need longer answers, that way they probably won't just answer to be polite, if they answer there's a good chance they're interested (since they're taking more time to answer thus putting more work into the conversation).
No probs, welcome.
Diamonds come to mind as a comparable market.
It's welfare. I wish I could opt out of both because I wont use them. I will always have private health insurance and SS will be pennies compared to the amount I have/will save for my retirement. I think that its more beneficial for some than others. 
It has begun. 
Anon: Probably.
**GOT IT!** http://nba-stream.com/live/bulls-live-stream/channel-2/  EDIT: I recommend the stream above posted by /u/endubs But I'll leave this sub-HD feed in case of an issue.
Many high fives!
Mom's speghetti.  
I was there a week ago and it looks like some of the graffiti has already been covered with fresh graffiti
Can't hold it back anymore. 
It's not iconic.  [It's just a well known used photo](http://www.parkerito.com/parker_ito/iStock_000000746781Medium.jpg).
His name is the Pursuer. He tracks and destroys people that bare the darksign, which is why he appears so often. I don't know much besides that. Correct me if I'm wrong.
Two new lines and a /s or /sarcasm at the very end is how I get around that.
I don't think it implies that at all. The only real implication is that everyone hates Mexicans.
usually you can go through a "diversion" program that gets rid of the charge after a year for small misdemeanors. Indiana here. 
Again, this is a misunderstanding. A "bitcoin" is just a convenient way to refer to a collection of satoshis. At the base level, there are X number of satoshis. That is the fundamental unit.
My favorite punchline to a joke that doesn't even exist!
HER health is HER responsibility. THEIR child is THEIR responsibility. An embryo is not a child. Under no circumstances should an able bodied adult have to get permission to alter their own body.
Fraud detection no, but typo detection yes. It can be an additional check on top of the mod-10 check to double check that the number is entered correctly on the client side before submitting. Any halfway decent fraudster is going to be giving you valid card numbers anyway.
Sweet. If you need me to do the unsharp mask for you I can do that.
The holograms are wrong on this id. The right state seal is off and the counties at the top are missing. Other than that and the hologram size it looks ok.  It looks really good but I would definitely never advertise this as a "flawless" replica. Just my opinion. 
Holy shit. You just summed up every Reddit comment in the book.  Edit: Moms spaghetti
Aww Alistaire, I feel like a baby bird that you have guided through this roller coaster of jimmie rustling and I am now being cut loose to fly on my own. I thank you for this wonderful series of entertaining stories of your life. I wish you (and Manda, Mike Robbie and the bros and Snarkymark) all the best in life and all of your endeavors. I shall miss you and everyone in your stories (except of course you know who).
Yes, hence why my next sentence is "Obviously this is not a true statement." I'm a female actuary so I of course do not believe that women are not good at math! Apparently my post is being interpreted that way though since I'm negative...
It is common outside of the States. 
Glad to hear your still there. 
Lutro0 does this  every day  during the week with his stream. 
I have so many mix emotion right now but we will power through together.
passion for *companionship*...
This is what I was thinking. I really like the low branch but it is already so thick and the movement sucks . It won't be as tall as it is now. Cheers for the advice
or even 58008918 if you're into that.
You're not going to tell me that you looked at this book and didn't immediately feel inspired to draw Ariel all over your maths notebook.
I can't believe this! you guys are amazing!
I just have huge hands. Well, I mean, look how much taller I am than you.
&gt; Hibbert's ~~"jump"~~ "flail" shot
Oh no, it got mixed up? Is that something you can check tonight or shall I wait till another day?
[Fast doge!](http://runt-of-the-web.com/wordpress/wp-content/uploads/2013/11/shibe-putin.jpg)
The problem is a bit bigger than the US, but I agree it probably will not be pretty.
I understand! I don't know why I am getting so many downvotes though.
Well he is one of those guys that swings as hard as he can every time he does. His problem wasn't the swing, it was pitch selection 
[Grantland - An Oral History of Malice at the Palace](http://grantland.com/features/an-oral-history-malice-palace/)
hahahaha! Gotta love a good hockey fan, we're never happy! I have been pissed ever since Chelios left the Habs!
Yeah I didn't have high hopes for this post, it was pretty obscure.  I don't even remember what fansite I downloaded it from originally.  It might have been TycoonPlanet or RCT INC but that's a shot in the dark and neither seem to be up and running anymore.  I'm definitely starting to play around with the landscape editor though, I'll be sure to post if I create anything worthwhile.  I've started by making a bunch of templates to save time.  All grass/sand maps of varying elevation and size.
One of my buddies said the fantastic four building was seen in the scene. I didn't believe him one bit. I said it was Tony Starks building, I guess I was wrong too (although it used to be his building).
I think that when you vape you're getting thc and very little to none of the cbd's, make sure your using the abv in some edibles to get a body high. I may be wrong, I'm new to vaping
i need somebody
Here we go!
Squats  Shrugs  Deadlifts
Penises, the ending -i for plurals is for latin-derived words ending in -us. However, the comment is referencing the name of the poster above him.
I liked his cartoons -particularly the PM series.
have you seen any instances of female eunuchs in brothels?
? I'm not sure I understand what you're saying. SK paused the game to inform the refs of the bug. I don't recall but it may have been mentioned by the casters as well during the pause.
Your mother.
Hopefully people realize this is a story of police abuse and not christian persecution. 
Likely because very few people have actually maxed the Covenant of Champions.
Idk why but I like girls with deeper voices
10,000!? With the combo and multi-kill bonuses it would have been closer to 300,000!
CAN WE GET SOME LANDRY FIELDS
Vote noted. I wish I could agree. I hope your right.
UHC? :D
PM me the profile I can tell you if you need a restraining order or an eye roll.  OKC probably filters on age. I'm 24 and your looking for 26+.  Ahh...That's a shame. My profile reads: I am a scholarly man who enjoys intense intellectual conversations. My passions include __________  I'm a dark haired gentlemen that could have a bead, I'm taking my shirt off for a good shitty mirror pick right now, and my first message is always "Ay bby wnt sum fuk"  We could have been perfect together.
First off, thank you for making my childhood awesome. And thanks for being a great guy.  So, my fiancée and I are going to be taking engagement pictures in May. I plan on using the Legacy Green/White Ranger morpher as a prop (I'll be posing and she will be rolling her eyes at me). Which power coin should I use for the photo?  Also, how awesome was it meeting Matt Smith and Karen Gillan?
I remember that - and I was born in the 90z - best trick or treat prize eva
I think his name is Jay Atkins.. or something close to that, he is pretty good!  - but i will say that Anders and Semmler are my go-to castrers
Laganja is receiving sympathy? All I see is hate for her on this sub-reddit, not shade, hate.
Perfect! Thanks for the input and reading. I'm no English perfectionist by any means so I'll definitely keep a look out
IT'S STARTING. WHAT.
[This](http://miamicarlins.files.wordpress.com/2013/06/jim-carrey.jpeg) is how the past month has felt as a Devils fan.
Fingers crossed!!!
Free drugs!? Hope he shared
Right, I keep forgetting that facts stop being facts when someone else sees them. That's why my computer only works when I think it does, and not actually any other time. Very Schrodinger.
**[Original Submission by /u/pleasecallmebigpapa](http://www.reddit.com/r/52WeeksOfDesign/comments/21ufin/week_1_concert_ticket_my_very_first_project/)** into /r/52WeeksOfDesign  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **1 year** * # of subscribers: **2,794** * # of mods: **6** * Subscribers per mod: **465**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: self.52WeeksOfDesign **(100%)** * Average ups/downs ratio: **87.90%** * % NSFW: **0%** * Average Score: **8**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~33** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **4** * Comments per post: **~3**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [Week 23: InDesign, Photoshop, Dreamweaver, Illustrator, &amp; Flash Splash Screens (55 points by /u/tuckels)](http://www.reddit.com/r/52WeeksOfDesign/comments/13xa22/week_23_indesign_photoshop_dreamweaver/) * Top this month: [[Week 1] - Admission Ticket (17 points by /u/MissHilaryRose)](http://www.reddit.com/r/52WeeksOfDesign/comments/1zkivk/week_1_admission_ticket/) * Top this week: [[Week 12] App Icons: Rotated shades (10 points by /u/Curnee)](http://www.reddit.com/r/52WeeksOfDesign/comments/21a434/week_12_app_icons_rotated_shades/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/52WeeksOfDesign](/r/52WeeksOfDesign)**   
You guys have an actual Townsville. Like in the powerpuff girls.   I suspect your expectations of normality are skewed.
I already play them on my phone. Download myboy free gba emulator and download some roms. I am 24 but it makes me feel so nostalgic.  The controls are good and my phone is bigger than a old Game Boy advance.
Not this fucking post. 
I'd feel so bad if I shit on a python's face. Then again, the fuck's the idiot doing in a toilet?
However it worked great for Constantinople, they were at their peak in technology, philosophy, math, arts and even human rights while Rome was crumbling.
Yeah. This is a really fascinating article.
To back you up with some numbers  F-22 Raptor  $150 million  Predator Drone  $4 million  So 1 fighter  =  37 Drones 
Ya think?
Weren't you supposed to be somewhere else?!
Thank you
**Attention!** Please keep in mind that the OP of this thread has chosen to mark this post with the **[Serious] replies only** tag, therefore any replies that are jokes, puns, off-topic, or are otherwise non-contributory will be removed.  If you see others posting comments that violate this tag, please report them to the mods!   Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I like Pointless, but I also like The Chase. Which is better? There's only one way to find out!
cowboys must be a shit franchise then.
Sweet!
[preview](http://i.imgur.com/l0NrUyq.png)
www.teamtreehouse.com or lynda.com. Yea, there's a subscription fee, but it's VERY easy to learn. 
thanks, seems like a great experience
It is in Ireland  Science
am i the only one who thought this was bullshit? there was a time period of like six hours to get the hat. hardly enough time. but if they did it again this year it would be kinda nice to those who didn't use reddit that day.
| **Permalink** | **Reason** |   |:-:|:-:|   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1reu2u/NoBody6991/cfimc19 | Possible game activation code trade without grey flair |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1reu2u/NoBody6991/cfzpcql | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/ceik0fx | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/ceik8ym | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/ceikajy | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/ceikf7a | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/cg741h7 | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/cg745yc | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1uitvg/ultimategamer_/cgft1mn | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1xv41r/berrset2/cgg59mc | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1xv41r/berrset2/cfgupti | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1zovyr/bond_00/cgg6dhm | Possible game activation code trade without grey flair |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/21fmto/kreight97/cgcjxft | Possible game activation code trade without grey flair |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1xznkw/DustAngel/cgg0q0i | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/21ud2r/scorer433/cggkmm3 | Possible game activation code trade without grey flair |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/1tdtxc/qurao/ceag91p | Matched with filter list |   | www.reddit.com/r/SGSFlair/comments/21ourn/Gualtrapa/cggp76n | Possible game activation code trade without grey flair |   &gt;**I'm a bot working for /r/SteamGameSwap**   ___   [^[FAQ]](http://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/wiki/faq#wiki_how_do_i_upgrade_my_flair.3F) [^[Changelog]](http://www.reddit.com/r/warheat1990/comments/1sb8sk/rsgsemployee_changelog/) [^[ReportBug]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=warheat1990&amp;subject=rSGSemployee%20bugs%20report) [^[Suggestion]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSteamGameSwap&amp;subject=rSGSemployee%20Suggestion)
Alright, I'll message ya
we have a fucking bench, wow
Your date is exactly 1 year after ours! Yay! 
Yeah...that doesn't sound friendly AT ALL. It's probably a good thing you didn't kick it or it would have bitten you.
From completing the "Cole's Legacy" dlc you get Cole's original jacket.
__^[wow ^so ^verify]__: ^/u/voxic11 ^-&gt; ^/u/GeorgeForemanGrillz __^Ð8.50000000 ^Dogecoin(s)__&amp;nbsp;^__($0.0043236)__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/dogetipbot/wiki/index)
I'm guessing maybe make the playoffs but no chance of winning a championship IMO.  So yeah, by Lakers standard I guess they're boned for next year.
Sociolinguistics...   ^^^if ^^^you ^^^want ^^^to ^^^do ^^^^it ^^^^^^right
&gt; This is only relevant if you're trying to be a market maker yourself. The rest of the world benefits from the narrower spread.  If I'm a big ticket player looking to make a long-term investment, and I put in an order for 1M shares of company X, how does it benefit me for a HFT to see my order and immediately "jump in front" of it to jack up the price by half a point, anticipating my large future purchase?  If I'm a retail investor, and I'm paying a flat mark-up on all my market orders, how does that benefit me?  HFTs just act as unsolicitated middle men, taking a cut between transactions when they are neither asked-for nor required.
Larissa Oleynik 
While the US situation is complicated because of your health system, this is actually a legitimate problem in other countries.  In Sweden, I spent 9 hours waiting in the ER with a fractured nose and jawbone. The insane pain was increased by the TV in the waiting room running a 9-hour Ellen DeGeneres marathon.  During this time, I counted 22 children who had stuck things up their nose with freaked out parents getting treated. I got to the ER at 10 am on a weekday, they could've just gone to a walk-in clinic (vårdcentral) OR a walk-in emergency clinic (närakut).  Then again, swedish healthcare might be tax-funded, but unless you are very severely injured, it's quality is appalling. There's two cases of misdiagnosed TBE, one case of borrelia in my social circle, thankfully these people left the country and went to Germany to get a second opinion before it was too late for them (one of them was close to death at that point). In sweden they just got some paracetamol, then sent home.
so you cut all psytrance BPM's in half?.........
Must of been the Philosophy Dept. I always loved those professors. I has Professor Potter mainly. 
&gt; I used to work for the team in marketing  That's fairly bold if you are going to say so you should provide some proof.  Otherwise it just looks like a created document.
This submission has been randomly featured in /r/serendipity, a bot-driven subreddit discovery engine. More here: http://www.reddit.com/r/Serendipity/comments/21vj2g/week_1_concert_ticket_my_very_first_project_xpost/
&gt;If they are good at what they do, but unethical, people see this as unjust. Unethical lawyers take cases where they know that the person is guilty, but are willing to help them for the right price. This happens every single day.  That's the thing. You can't know if a person's guilty. It is impossible to know if a person is guilty before all the evidence is presented at trial (and even then, its still skeptical). Having presumptions of a person's guilt before a trial, and influencing your legal decisions of whether or not to protect them is unethical in my opinion. 
And this guy....uh number 10, Peter Harrold. Errr umm. Well, he was once on the Kings, and he plays defense! 
Or maybe Hal from Malcolm in the Middle
Again, it's difficult, since these situations often happen in places where the government is either very weak or, worse, supports the calls for violence.  In some instances, it's rather clear: a radio station urging for the deaths of Tutsi while a genocide against them is being carried out (or while they are being heavily persecuted) is crossing the line. This should be pretty evident to any impartial observer, but enforcement is likely to be the responsibility of the outside world.  Here's my greater view:  - Weak Government   - No ability to prevent violence   - Can call for international help (peacekeepers, election monitors) to enforce its rules.   - **National *elected* governments can determine what the threats are, but these limits should be in line with international opinion**: it makes sense for Afghanistan to curb Taliban propaganda since a clear and present danger exists to national security, but neither Russia nor the US could legitimately curb communist, fascist, green, or libertarian ideologies, since public security is not threatened by them *at this time*. The only exception would be documents that directly call for violence: a neo-Nazi group does not have the right to publish a hitlist of enemies slated for execution, nor can it call for the deaths of specific people or groups of people.  - "Bad" Government   - No willingness to prevent violence   - International community needs to intervene in a *legitimate* way if it thinks the *costs are worthwhile*   - What is the value of a human life, as measured in dollars, in U.S./NATO/Russian/AU/UN troops, or in the chance for improved regional peace?   - **International community makes the call--this is not always effective, but don't underestimate the power of world opinion and the 'CNN effect'.  Also, this doesn't have to be the UN (SC or GA), Russia, or the US, but it will often be.**  - "Normal" Government   - Willing to prevent violence   - Able to prevent violence   - NGOs, Foreign Govs, internal interest groups can urge the government to monitor the situation, but no action is needed.   - **The national government gets to make the call, but it doesn't have a justification to ban materials since security isn't threatened**  I know I run the risk of being too pro-government and pro-international, something that isn't seen in a positive light here on Reddit, but so be it.  Edit: if you see things differently, please leave a good comment like /u/Lorpius_Prime does--I'll get back to you, promise.
One of these days, I will be funny enough to be in one of these.
Okay, I will check it out sometime! I don't know all the different subs. This was the first place that came to my mind.
What the hell is going on?!  Is that daggering?  
&gt;so I could care less  http://www.reddit.com/r/YouShouldKnow/comments/21ev8i/ysk_its_i_couldnt_care_less_not_i_could_care_less/
Both of your accounts are 0 days old...   Willing to put my entire portfolio down that you are the same person.
*nods* please I-if he does still have it or you find it let him keep it *whimpers as tears roll* I I know its unlikely but I want him to have it....so if you see it tell me but don't return it *forces a smile as I cry* can you do that please?
This seems a little harsh.  First, maybe what the poster meant isn't exactly the view you've described as "all a matter of opinion".  Often non-experts (and I assume the original poster isn't an expert) don't quite know exactly what they're trying to say when they ask these sorts of questions.  Maybe on reflection the poster would gravitate towards non-cognitivism or cultural relativism or Gauthier-style contractarianism or something like that, an anti-realist view that has garnered more professional support.  But, second, I'm a philosopher, and I take seriously the thesis that ethics is all a matter of opinion, even given your construal of that thesis (as saying that ethical claims can be true for some people but not for others).  Probably people who believe this view accept the consequence that most of ethical discourse is futile.  Trying to convince someone not to abort, on this view, is no more productive than trying to convince someone that chocolate is the best ice cream flavor.  That seems like a reasonable view, worth taking seriously.
No, it's not one workout- I do legs mon/wed/fri and push-tuesday, pull-thursday, weekends: 1hour of abs
Exactly. It seems completely random too, even with a square background it still zooms in crazy amounts. Guess I'll just find a new wallper :/
What is it?  Op pls...
You're welcome. I don't know everything but if I can help I will. Good luck.
[](/rick2 "Try clearing your browser history.")
Ain't it though?
I was a teenager in the SF Bay Area during the late 60s and early 70s. My list would include: cool roach clips, Black Sabbath and Led Zepplin, lots of hair, incence, acid, political awareness, Volkswagens, skipping school and hanging out in SF or Berkeley. My high school sweetie had a 10/10 ass and liked to wear hot pants. Bliss.
Is Rex Tillerson more interested in Russia than he is in Canada? Take a look at Exxon's plans and see!
Remember, though, that Bujold only agreed to do the mini-series. She was already making too much money from patriotic serials and committing to science fiction just wasn't her style. She might have been convinced to stay on if the money was good, but it was likely they'd have had to re-cast the Janeway role with another actress, and followers wouldn't buy it. Can you imagine someone like Glenn Close or Jodie Foster in the commanders' seat? Or worse yet, some unknown actress we'd never heard of? Without Bujold it doesn't work.
Stages of George RR Martin grief: 1. denial - Martin is writing, Martin is writing, he'll finish, I know he'll finish 2. anger - Damn you Martin get off your ass and write  3. Bargaining - I'll preorder the series if only Martin will promise to finish writing 4. Depression - He'll never finish. He never planned to finish. I died at the red wedding along with everyone else. 5. Acceptance - It would be nice if he finished the series but after all there is still Brandon Sanderson. I'm at stage 5 so I'll believe he will finish the series when/if he does. 
So these services existed from the beginning of time? 
You're ugly and your momma dresses you funny.
Right, but many people refer to the random number god when they say RNG. It's kind of like a joke.
http://media0.giphy.com/media/rl0FOxdz7CcxO/giphy.gif
Well, if they left out the trigger part, it would be okay. I mean, you can sometimes see screamers coming from a mile away, but when they aren't obvious, it *really fucking gets to me.* I have had a panic attack or two from them. Do I think people shouldn't use them? Nah. It's not exactly the worst thing in the world to do. I just can't handle them. I don't fault the creator for it.
I'd like to enter!!! I haven't bought the DLC yet but would love to! Thanks for the giveaway
That guy is definitely a huge douche or socially clueless.   Number one was a backhanded compliment.   Number two was telling you straight up your nose is ugly.   Number three is borderline, he may think he's trying to be helpful, he may be picking on your insecurities. Hard to tell without hearing it and seeing his body language at the time. 
Student loans don't normally have to be paid at all until after the expected graduation date, so I suspect that your parents either took a unique type of loan or aren't being totally honest. As for paying for school, you're going to have to talk to the financial aid office. This is just the opinion of a non-graduate (who got an offer from Harvey Mudd), but I'd rather graduate from a state school with $25k in loans than  from MIT with $250k owed.  This is fact: you should not go on a mission. Hinckley was right as a young man, its a waste of your time and your parents' money.
Drugs will never go away. Period. No if ands ors or buts. They have always been here and always will be. Let's make the best of the situation.
Had a good laugh on Sumo Darkness :D  Thanks for sharing ! 
You have to be much more agressive than usual, and with two swords you do more damage. Sadly there are not many dual wield viable weapons. Im using two +10 falchions and +10/+8 murakomos.
that's alright, hope he has a nice new home!
I'm not sure if I should correct you or if I should assume you're intentionally spreading misinformation for the lulz and just leave you to your business.
Gnomefather's engine sounds. Still better than vanilla WoT!
You can't assume independence on those stats making the math severely off.   Although what your saying is accurate rhe numbers aren't quite as extreme, I expect
Yes, sir 
I assume OP has more than a few outfits
Good thing you took her pic and posted it here to further humiliate her.
Certainly not a bad guess. But there has to be a concise answer, right? Right?!
Why not just watch it and see?
http://imgur.com/sp4vgju here it is so far before I had to stop for the day.
Curious as to what jersey you're going to get. I'd assume Brady, but some people have different reasons for their merch.
We call this the busted can of biscuits. 
57, Cadbury eggs!
Hm I see, thanks anyways mate!
You paid into it for this reason. Use it and bust your ass to find a job. Goodluck OP
That was the best show I have ever been too. Donald is the most talented person I have ever seen.
This is actual feedback I received on eBay.
Fuck me, its actually happening....
Im not even mad. That's amazing
Brown out.
Pretty funny, but wrong subreddit
Wow this is awesome and detailed, would love to see this monthly for each IGC...  Thanks!
always Catherine for me = ( the worst time we were allies  all game then as soon as the nuke stage comes in she said "we have been allies a long time but history is written by the winners" (or words to that effect) .... what came next was not fun = P 
Right... Like, who the fuck could drink that and destroy it??
I kinda hit my limit on Lego buying already. (And there haven't been any good sets released.)
Some part of me was hoping you'd say "Burbank" and I could go steal it tonight.
Hi everyone! So sad this is the last time we'll be here for an episode discussion.  Edit: I'm crying already!  Edit: That look he gave "The Mother"!  Edit: Omg the first pregnancy.  Edit: Barney and Robin divorcing and a 3rd baby. All this info in such a short little time!  Edit: I think they're leading up to the Vesuvius scene with each flash forward.   Edit: Noooooooooooooooooo!!! Wth!!! We were totally right.
How else are you supposed to end that? Cancer or some shit? Hell naw
Oh my god its starting.
I would get the 500 lb rated ones if you get them for the seats. I'm no expert in physics but think about what happens when you sit your ass down on the seat. There's gravity bringing down your weight so even though you weigh 200 lbs, the seat might experience 500 lbs for a brief moment.
I didn't even know that was an option, but wouldn't that require you to re-deal at least once to reset that?
stack of d blocks
i don't think that's his girl's idea of 'cool'
Pretty sure it's a dude with tits
I'm not looking to 'dance the dance,' I'm just curious.  As a layman.
Tesseract here; you don't even know.
man angel beats,clannad, and guilty crown really taught me that life is so beautiful and that we should treasure all our freinds, family and anime
Moldran, Alkaizer
Dawn of War II, World in Conflict, XCOM, Witcher 2, Titanfall
I probably should blog and so on but frankly it hasn't been necessary. I have preliminary discussions with potential clients all the time -- probe them about the project, give smart feedback and make a great pitch if/when I feel it's relevant. In all honesty, being knowledgeable and confident is enough to put you ahead of a lot of the competition.  One thing I find makes a great first impression: don't jump in and offer solutions right away. You know almost nothing about the problem yet. By taking the time to learn first you a.) save yourself a ton of headache by avoiding projects which are wrong for you, and b.) create an impression of real expertise rather than just another developer selling him or herself.
You're good. I like having you in the threads. 
no nickname 4613-7762-2661 ign rexx Available now?
*Returns to his starting position.*
Where did you buy these? I'm sorry if it says the dispensary in the picture, I couldn't find it. 
He will be more social when he finds kids who share his interest in reading. My dd reads like there is no tomorrow (she finished Divergent in less than 24 hours a week ago. She also read all seven Harry Potter books during the summer of 2nd grade).  Don't discourage your son to read. Maybe take him to a Public library reading club and he can meet like minded kids?   Maybe he could read to his brother too? 
I was folding laundry after coming out of the shower. There were some loose strings on a towel so I went to pull them off but they were on there pretty strong and my hand slid and the string dug into my finger and cut me.  I mean, it was really small, but I cut my hand ON A TOWEL.
Which maps in the past have had island bases without rocks?  In my experience, taking an island base as a Terran is not always an easy advantage.  Defending an island can be extraordinarily difficult since so many random openers shut it down.  Mutas, oracle, warp prism...
Ah, i see.
You look so at peace with that donk
I appreciate the time it took.  We devils fans aren't bad:)
So when should I go? I'll be in NYC from Thursday to Sunday.
I don't give a fuck what people say about this, this is good shit.
Haha sorry. It's a mix of a couple different ones - Click UI, Mianogen, Holo Icons, and IcoPack. 
Why doesn't anyone sell pre-made speed pills? You *know* there would be demand. Lots of college kids aren't gunna go buy a milligram scale and some empty gel caps but would be willing to do speed as an adderall alternative. 
Pokefurs just kind of stump me because I don't know Pokemon. The kind of real animal someone uses can usually tell you a little bit about their personality, but I don't know what kind of people are drawn to what kind of Pokemon.  I have no problem with Pokefurs, it will just take me a little longer to get to know you.
If you are interested in playing this season, there is still an open spot in my league (that I literally created today)!  P.S. /u/bravo_delta told me I should ask you.
So this isn't related to the game, but nba 2k has convinced me the draft lottery is indeed rigged. I have a few MyGM accounts, so I chose my Magic one.   I ended up getting the 6th overall pick in the draft.  The fucking Miami Heat somehow traded for somebody's lotto pick during the year, and they were slotted initially at 11th.   During the actual lottery, however, instead of hitting the most likely outcome of 11th pick overall, they get 3rd overall. This is after an NBA title where the Heat beat the Rockets 4-3, and where LBJ, D Wade, and Bosh all signed back with the Heat.  what the fuck
bullshit this was a documentary on channel 4 you just twisted it slightly.
I highly recommend Glen Hansard.  I wouldn't really say that his style is similar to Jack Johnson's, as he often sings and plays with a great deal of intensity.  I'd start by checking out the following three songs to see if you like music - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hgG2rljJqH4  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rIryYxV0UTA  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MiElKniPBrk   The first is a song from Glen's recent solo album.  The other two are songs he originally recorded with The Frames, both of which also appeared in the movie "Once."  It's a spectacular movie, if you haven't seen it.
The 1st link under "Resources" on the sidebar is a well respected beginners routine. Once you have been doing that for a while you will probably want to make your own routine based on your specific goals.
Thanks for the info
I would definitely purchase one of these. 
So glad to hear that things are going well for the band especially John and Josh. I think there was another article where Josh said he didn't think both of them would work together but its great to hear that it might be a possibility someday. 
If you experienced traffic in north Jersey/metro area, you will know what this means. I have to stop quickly because heavy traffic started forming as I was driving. 
Yes
Oh shit! Thanks for the heads up!
Might be biased but Australia. Never held it before while the others in the other bidding countries have. Have all stadiums ready due to Australian rules football/ cricket stadiums  and the MCG to host the final which holds 100 thousand plus. Melbourne, Sporting capital of the world
I really dislike people like you. I haven't yet had the pleasure to meet JDF but I know he does a lot for his fans. He goes out of his way for us and a true hero. And then he has to put up with pathetic people like you making nasty comments like this for no reason and no truth behind them. 
Congrats!
brings shame to both. makes it look like the father didn't raise his daughter right (even if he did) and that would be unacceptable.
can i add you Al? i need bergmite
Nirvana, nice!
[This](http://i.imgur.com/O2pBe.gif) is why I'm a teacher.
your breasts look pretty normal to me. they're definitely not deformed. please don't feel you have to have surgery to change them for the approval of others.  that being said, if you're doing this for yourself, you don't need anyone's permission. maybe seek some therapy first, and definitely do your research. don't take this decision lightly though. plastic surgery is still surgery, so it should only be done if the benefits outweigh the risks.  EDIT: could someone explain why i'm getting downvoted? having plastic surgery for insecurity without receiving any kind of unbiased mental health counseling (eg not by the surgeon) is dangerous as it runs the risk that the insecurity won't be abolished and you've just undergone a dangerous procedure.
Slow clap
http://i.imgur.com/YmAjtKO.gif
How about let him eat when he is hungry instead of stressing him out. Im not a dog person why would you want to control another being to that extent
Be careful dont grind it to hard or the plastic will crack. dont cross thread it 
We have a Army.  The military theme in Crystal failed for lack of things to hold on, but now...  The only thing I dislike is "Take over the world" that some people are wanting to give to A. Comic Book villain now? What the hell?  A as villain doesn't work as well, so, let's give a proper objective to the army.
Duck tape that shit back together.
I found it impossible to find action @ that player level.  I stayed on a server that went from ~80 players to ~10. over the course of a month or two due to resets etc. I would run circles around the road looting every rad town and would never see anybody.
they grow buds just not as good bud that's full of seeds. you can get plenty high off of wild grown pot.
The Teen Titans game you described already exists. It came out late aughts. It was an adaption of the show.
Because you fail to recognize the magnitude of Russia's actions. Yes I agree with you that the US is not the good guys, but to take a pro russian stance simply to be anti-US is asinine. Stop with your lesser evils bullshit and realize in this situation, Putin is threatening wwIII.
I understand your point, I'm not denying it, and I'll not argue as I know you are right.   I just think it is an Unkrainian issue and it is Ukraine that needs to deal with it. Russia has nothing to do with it.   Russia needs to mind their own business and look at the problems they have at home, that they hide and deny. And believe it or not, there's much more neo Nazis and more cases of Neo Nazis agressions in Russia than there is in Ukraine. But it is not convenient to let people know it, as many other things that the Russian media, heavily controlled by the state, works on hiding.  
To add- Basically don't bring anything of any real importance or sentimental value;  especially expensive clothes or jewellery. Bring things that you will no be heartbroken if it should get wrecked, stolen, etc. cause there is always a very good chance it could. 
I've healed in WoW with all the healing classes, and I was able to heal a Kel Voreth run on my medic pretty well we only wiped once on the second boss because we didn't know to dps down one of the probes and only one death on the first boss and one on the second.  We got DCed and the instance reset on the way to the last boss though.  It takes some getting used to running around and staying out of telegraphs and making sure players are inside of your healing ones.  I had healed in PVP a good bit leading up to it so that got me more used to being mobile and getting people inside my telegraphs.
I love watching Edna Mode in the last 2 minutes of NCIS with no context
[I feel you.](http://i.imgur.com/X35xW.gif)
I understand your point from a perspective of impact to the environment.  However, there are two aspects of whaling that I believe make it far different than other types of meat production:  * ecology goes far beyond type of whale selected.  For the health of any herd, care should be taken to choose what members of the herd are harvested.  Whaling simply culls all animals the whalers can reach.  Because whales will not leave other family members which are harpooned, entire family lines are eliminated, which is a problem for the genetic diversity (and thus longevity) of the herd. * whaling is incredibly cruel in how the animals are harvested.  Imagine a cow being chased down by a jeep until it is exhausted, then shot with an arrow tethered to a cable.  Then imagine the jeep pulling the cow onto its side and dragging it by the arrow around the yard for 25 minutes, shooting it with a gun several times, before the cow finally drowns in its own blood.  All this after watching its calf die in the exact same manner beforehand.  I have seen firsthand, many forms of hunting and farming.  While there are many other issues in "factory" meat production, I have never ever seen anything which approaches this amount of animal cruelty.  I am especially concerned that we allow this to occur to a species as sentient as whales, one of the most sentient species on the planet, following humans.  An example from which I drew my analogy: (warning graphic - but shortened from it's original 25 minute length) http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=27nX3Dsv9Xk  Many other examples there, if you have the stomach for it.  Once you take into account the poor ecology of any whaling, the sentience of the species, and the way in which they are cruely harvested, it becomes clear that whaling is not simply the equivalent of any other meat production.  Whaling simply must be eliminated.
KOHO radio news 
not that impressive considering how athletic he is already.
+/u/dogetipbot gigaflip doge verify  Thanks! Have some more to spread around
Different Strokes for different folks.
Gold is the corpse of value... - Stephenson
The best pranks are personal. If your mate is really proud of something, it's a great target. If there's an in-joke use it.  Another personal favourite is the pranks that look like they're far worse than they really are - give your friend a heart-attack but next-to-zero work to fix it. One of the best reactions I got was from finding an area that looked similar to a mate's base, setting off a nuke, building a few leftover pieces that looked like some of his base survived, putting up a sign saying "I may have gone a little far..." then replacing his linking book with one that went there. I let him think it was real for about 20 minutes :P
Unfortunately a bunch of your issues are general problems with many consulting shops and with government work, and around DC that's almost all the available work.  A lot of consulting is not about successful projects in the end, it's about billing the client.  Amazing success now may actually get in the way of billing them next year - if you keep a man from learning to fish, you can sell him fish forever.  I suspect that most customizable software is deliberately bad in raw form specifically to sell customization too, so you get to work with absolutely horrible products. And of course selling to the government is selling to a customer who doesn't want to spend more than they are authorized and wants to get exactly what is in the spec document... and that is more important than success or usability because if they deviate or spend more the press and the public will eviscerate them, whereas if they fail according to plan that's too boring for anyone to notice.  There is a lot of better software development out there, but it is in companies where the software is the product, not the ongoing ability to bill more hours.  Going independent would be very, very hard without a set of contacts to get you started.  Do you have that set of contacts?  It is likely that you can't take any clients from your current company without someone getting sued.  On another note, you are not being petulant about 3 hours of commute.  That will seriously grind you up.  Anyway your first out might be to look around for a different type of software work if you can find it rather than immediately striking out on your own if you don't have a set of clients or a way to get them lined up.
Thanks for the advice!   I'm working on the putting game constantly, those 3 putts are no fun. Something unique about golf that I enjoy is the pressure and trying to simulate it on a practice green. There was fast-moving group behind us that made me want to rush a few putts... big mistake.
&gt; I normally do 30 - 45 minutes on the treadmill, about 15 minutes of this is actually running  That seems like a lot of cardio especially if you're doing weight lifting afterwards. Maybe you could reduce your cardio session by half instead and work out, this could help you.   It is not uncommon to feel nauseous when overtraining, every body did it at least once, you'll have to learn to know your limits.
Did you have it hidden somewhere?
This sounds like a ridiculously easy fix that could be implemented without much effort.   Just because the key is now consumed, the lobby/session should not be dissolved. Instead drop everyone into a generic session where they can still chat, change loadouts etc. In fact, when doing stuff on the starmap, you can already have such lobbies. You pick what to do by clicking on something on the starmap. So put the void/derelict missions on the starmap as well!   Whoever clicks first get a popup saying 'This will use up a &lt;mission&gt; key' (Yes/No). The lobby then changes background to the mission type, and the button at the top changes to "Play Now".   Further, there needs to be a button to cancel key selection without dissolving the lobby. 
Good points. However America could take russia down, they are 10 yrs behind military tdchnology. DPRK would be no problem, accept china, unless we help them indirectly, give south korea weapons, ship asian army men to SK so they can fight, and SK would be K
Oh plugins how I love you.   &gt;Stay out of **butts**. The silver lining everyone keeps talking about might be another airplane going in the opposite direction. Reliable sources also report that mountains have been known to hide out in **butts**.
I love that field. and playing with BAR is always tight. 
I had a beer in England when I was 15 or so. It was awesome. My dad got it for me.  My first drink in the USA upon turning 21 was a Long Island Iced Tea at a bar that served *really, REALLY* strong Long Island Iced Teas. The beer was better.
Whoa, old Barney hair. 
as an american woman, i don't really see the point of promising to promise to marry someone. but everyone has their own sentimental traditions. to many, promise rings are akin to claddagh rings.
This is correct. I lost my wallet a while back, and someone put it in a Canada Post mailbox, and they will deliver it to an address in the wallet.
Went to the petrol station. Paid at the counter. Went into my car, and drove off. Something similar happened when I bought some food while being sleep deprived, as I went to the convenient store to get some bread, paid it, and just went off. No joke, as my attention span was so short, I was day dreaming almost all the time when I was sleep deprived. 
They start cropping up in dwarven centurions' loot around Level 40.  
Here we go. No on the Raptors can check Bron
Disgaea: Hour of Darkness... You could steal the horse wiener from a zombie boss later in the game.  http://search.yahoo.com/search?fr=chr-greentree_gc&amp;ei=utf-8&amp;ilc=12&amp;type=293224&amp;p=horse+wiener+disgaea
Well, he's probably gonna he pissed that you're walking around the house wearing *his* present.   Wait a minute . . .   Oooooooooooooooooh.  Um.  Never mind.
Been asked, been answered. Use your brain, or GTFO.
no.
wait. your D men asked the coach if he wanted to change them off?  Thats a lack of confidence right there.
Nice try Politboru
Thanks! Nice feedback. I'll try playing a bit more with it to see what happens. 
wow Abraham Lincoln was a dick
Pegging lol
[Something like this](http://i.imgur.com/mCuukUj.png)
well... that was the best score i've ever gotten... yikes porn is compelling
Missing object. Reward.
I'm fat so I like Kmart for everyday undies and I have to shop online for the sexy ones. My workmates have a bad habit of opening my mail though ugh.
We already have our safety situation covered, even if it's not what everyone wants. We have a starting veteran, a serviceable starter, a promising rookie and several people who can fill in if needed on special teams.   Like it or not I have a feeling that's what we are going to roll with next year. 
thanks bby I'll make one tomorrow
Don't know if I can post links but here is an article that I read earlier at school. http://blogs.truckinweb.com/6806215/opinions/gm-recall-for-all-2014-trucks-and-2015-suvs/
Federal law would prohibit labeling a product "Kentucky Bourbon" if it was not made in Kentucky, so essentially the standards for "Kentucky bourbon" are A.) that the product meets the legal requirements to be called "bourbon," and B.) that the product be made in Kentucky.
Post it when she does! And then pm it to me. haha
Definitely doable. How long is this ostinato? My hand was getting tired playing that 3-string bar in measures 3,4,7, and 8.
*I run past the tree*
Nope.  http://www.firstworldwar.com/source/belgianreportongermanultimatum.htm
Thanks for the summon guys!  We appreciate the concern at keeping the community clean. As defined by SL in this [thread] (http://www.reddit.com/r/CODGhosts/comments/21qftg/via_live_cheaters_spawn_trapping_ps4_dom_please/) , since the opposite team in the video had the opportunity to fight back or even choose a different route, it may not be considered bannable. Do remember that we don't direct control over bans, so the security team may take a different stance. You can feel free to report the in game or forward this to report@infinityward.com.  Thanks, ^AJ
jesus please no
As far as I know, as long as you have updated your address with them, and submitted your renewal, your license is still valid.  As for resubmitting for your rpal, it could take up to 2 months, so you should be good.  My advice is to submit your rpal application, and advise them you are awaiting your results. They have a fax number you can then submit your results to, using your referral #.  There is an entire thread regarding this on CGN, check it out for more info.  http://www.canadiangunnutz.com/forum/showthread.php/464083-Shorten-PAL-Approval-Times
He only made 3 appearances in 2010 before he went on the DL, one can safely assume he was hurt from day one. 
They've been saying we would win the league since we beat Everton. 
Best scene in the Super Mario Bros. movie!
People actually have to ask about things like this?!
What do you eat pre-workout and how long before?
the reviews on amazon for the CM 7777 preamp are horrible.  Very poor quality, many, many, many doa units.   The top of the line channel master is now the cm-5020.  Very, very expensive significantly smaller than the antennacraft hd-1850 or the winegard 8200u with much lower performance.
Excuse me while I kiss this guy.
Gold is the corpse of value... - Stephenson
We all shall now praise the dark lord, Chutulu, for swift return of volcano sauce! "All hail Chutulu!"
But Heimer is too squishy for this to work. Often in a team fight I'll (as in me, under lvl 30 summoner) drop ult turret and then die while the turret helps the team.  So if it dies too then I did nothing.  Maybe my play is poor, but really, he is too squishy for the turrets to auto die.
Coffins
And it's not really that short at all.
I'd buy that tea towel
I was going to get 2i2 but seemed worth the extra money for the 2i4 for the additional features. 6i6 is awesome but I'm on a budget so i went with 2i4
For the same reason we rest at bonfires: because it feels safe.
As most will have read before, Chad has Bladder fistula which is caused by crohns disease and said earlier on twitter he would have to get surgery.   Hopefully surgery will not be needed and Chad will be fine with the medication!   Keep fighting Chad! 
Uh what are you waiting for?
niggercunt
HIMYM series finale. Here we go.
Wait im confused the dodgers and angles did play today 
No problem I'm glad I could! :D Have fun!
I wish. It's a Hi Score games
OOC: Dead XD
and that, is why i always carry an arrow trap with me, so i can hold and and see any trap wires.
My kid LOVES his dentist, and gets upset if we try to go with them. He gets excited about going, and has a little boy crush on his dental hygienist.   I'd follow your kid's lead, and let her go alone unless she freaks out. They've got her best interests in heart! 
Every time the teacher faces the board, everyone scoots their desk up a little but, as quietly as possible.  Or, everyone agrees on a specific time (like 2:05) and at that time, everyone tosses one shoe up to the front of the classroom.
Agreed. Perhaps they would prefer only negative reinforcement. "Well... you really fucked that one up, dumb ass. Better give up now.". That would go much farther than "Great job on that really hard math problem. I bet you can solve the next one too!".".
All caps should have this instruction!
very interesting
Holy shit. Do you really have a triple 4K setup?
Hmmm, the math doesn't add up.  Alistair's eldest brother is now 30, while in the first story he is 15.  Alistair was 6 in the first story, meaning that there is a 9 year difference between the two, meaning she is currently 21.  Now first, how did everyone get into the bar if only half the characters are over 21.  Yeah, Canada and fake IDs, but that's not the confusing part.  With those ages, all of this happened last year, and Vick would have had the accident very recently, like in the last couple months or weeks.  The epilogue seems to imply that a bit more time has lapsed. Maybe I'm being overly paranoid but quite frankly just seems too perfect that we'd get everything nicely tied in a bow at the end because Alistair just happened to be watching the right local news station at the right time.
We're getting really close to having Mog sidekicks, aren't we?
The thing is,  the zany prompts are important.  Not just for a sense of levity, but as a challenge for writers.  This challenge lies in filling in the holes left behind by a simple "what if," as you put it.  The "what if" question is akin to describing a new law of physics -you assume it just is.  But, this doesn't answer all of our questions as a reader. What does this law mean? How does it define the world around you? What limitations exist on this law? Consider the novel Warm Bodies.  Its plot boils down to "zombie falls in love with a human," which is about on par with the writing prompts OP listed as being zany.  But the author doesn't just stop at that!  He takes care to define these zombies, gives them (ironically) life and culture. By the time we are introduced to the humans, we know how the zombies work, eat, hunt, live, we know almost everything about their existence.  He explores every nook and cranny of the implications of the existence of zombies, and we haven't even gotten to the meat of the prompt yet.  What follows from the world that the author built is a touching and deep story of love and the human spirit, and a cleverly hidden Aesop, if you interpret the zombies as an analogue of depression, or something similar.  All from a prompt that is, as OP put it, "to silly to help us improve."  So, basically, I'd like to play the Devil's advocate here, and say it is not the prompt, but the writer himself who presents himself the challenge.  It is not the integrity of the prompt, but the creativity of the writer that is being tested. It is not the prompt, but the writer who becomes a legend.  If you cannot spin a crazy "what if" into a plausible story, admit it to yourself, and TRY ANYWAY.  You might surprise yourself.  EDIT drag-to-type isn't quite perfect, it seems.
Actually, you have to write exactly what the student said, word for motherfuckin word.  Source: am a teacher
I've always found the idea of a draft to be ancient and unnecessary these days, from back when typewriters didn't have a backspace key. What is the point anymore?
The year was 1928, when you might have seen Al Capone dancing the Charleston on top of a flagpole. 
Siestas may actually increase productivity, just sayin' :P
Did you ever do the thing where you'd shoot at the goal and try to save it before it went in?
Wowww, mailbag has really exploded. I think they, (like myself) just expected it to be fan-letters and the odd dumb fanmade gift. Never expected it to get to the point where they'd receive gifts in excess of 100$ and videos of them opening/reading them being over an hour long. It's just mind blowing
I am talking about apples and that post was about oranges. It's a much more complicated situation that I have already delved into numerous times in this thread and quite frankly will take much more thought than just one sentence to refute an entire argument for either side.
Clearing one's path of Legos results in a sentence of a year.
Yeah, I think they have everything from modern to old school methods of printing. Good family business.
I bought his app on google play, I bought it again when it was removed.  I feel a lot of people at forgetting that the current app is free, with an optional IAP to unlock a few pro features.   In the end, we're talking about a few dollars that some people are trying to take back from an small developer doing good things for the Usenet community. I don't think that is reasonable, especially considering he had no control over the google play situation. 
Hand-dipped beeswax candles and whale-oil lamps are the real hipster lighting.
Except there isn't just "one case" that people single out here. Bad wins/losses happen every day of the season. 
you mean interpreted
usually i just stare at them until they get unnerved and leave. 
Yeah this is what I came here to say as well, looking back toward your disc during the reachback is probably the best way to avoid 'rounding' on your pull through.  Otherwise though, great form for being less than a year into throwing!
It surely couldn't be the fact that evangelicals have tried everything in their power over the past 40 years to crush out any and all they didn't like. The fact that people are starting to side with the oppressed instead of the oppressors doesn't mean they are being persecuted. Which leads me back to my original point. Fighting back and saying enough is not opressing christians.   Edit: I want to add, just because people like gays more than christians, just shows that people are becoming more tolerant of those different from them. The reason christian popularity is going down, is because they insist on ruling everybody else's lives bacause they don't agree with it. I see laws against my marriage in state constitutions based on nothing more than 'jesus thinks it's icky'. More and more, states are trying to codify bulling of gays (or other minorities) based on nothing but 'jesus thinks it's icky'. Christians love to come out with 'divine punishment' speeches when a bird farts the wrong way. When there is a hint of a fraction of this sort of hate becoming law against christians, then they can cry persecution. People leaving the religion and supporting equal rights is nowhere near the definition of persecution, and crying that it does shows everyone how childish and hateful people of the faith can be. 
Shutter speed 1/250, iso 400, let the camera select the aperture, fire away! assuming daylight...
Shhh, you're gonna give them ideas.
OK, my character has two distinct looks and switches using a hat of disguise. One is a priest in red and white robes with grey gloves and a mace. He is clean shaven and has long hair.   His other appearance is a rugged scholar/archivist with a sort of threatening look. He dresses in leather clothing with straps. He wears a black fedora-ish hat and has some moderate facial hair.  I am playing 3.5, and he is a cleric/malkonvoker. Thanks for your consideration!
**DONG**
Kids will be kids; idiots will be idiots. You can't enforce or legislate common sense (or courtesy).
&gt; mind-altering substances I guess.  Haha no she wasn't. I could probably get any kind of drugs I wanted at my college through maybe 3 texts? No one refers to alcohol as alcohol and drugs. She's full of lies. I'm sorry that she sucks.
I keep on looking for a post of gold.
Oh hi guys.   So I'm the Zoe from the article and I just wanna clarify: there is, was, and likely never will be any beef between Jon and I. Reality TV is just fucking stupid.   If I wasn't totally fucked by the contract to go into more details I would. But I think Jon is pretty rad actually!
Good luck blowing into the slot.
Yeah,I didn't think you mined.  The problem here is that Bitcoin has been and always will be different things to different people. For me, it's always been a speculative process mining for an asset. Just because the IRS never asked for public opinions from people like me, doesn't mean their definition is correct. To even think they would get it right the first time is naive.
Haha nice man! 
One of my best friends from childhood, who I had a crush on at the time this was revealed, had recently gone through a very angry, frustrating phase where he thought he was gay. He went on to describe the kinds of porn he would get off to, which was almost entirely rape/skull-fucking/torture. We always had an inkling about his orientation, but his preferences and anguish broke my sixteen year old heart. 
Khalil Mack fanboy signing in.
I have over 65 other games, but meh. Planetside! 
Release them at night and they won't fly away until daytime.
I'm in the same boat. So after the six weeks you could play guitar again? 
One thing to remember when letting go of leg/ankle/knee cranks like this, you don't fly off and roll away. Once the ref lets you know to let go, you have to release the pressure in a controlled way. That's why it looks "slow", but half an inch the other way is A LOT of relief. Looks like Palhares lets go in this way.
http://www.thepieguyz.com/ They're up at north park and torbram. 
So in other words the same behavior as single player maps. Sounds like a good suggestion. Actually, sounds like a "OF COURSE!!! WHY DON'T THEY ALREADY HAVE THAT?!" suggestion.
[SOOOO CUTE](http://www.amazon.com/dp/B00HIBCSSG/ref=wl_it_dp_o_pC_nS_ttl?_encoding=UTF8&amp;colid=2CI9QSZ95IE4H&amp;coliid=I2WBA9N0E7FM0X&amp;psc=1)
Yes. Oh I had totally forgotten about it. ART has worked flawlessly so kinda hard to blame it when things go wrong. Thanks!
It seems to just be:  MANIFEST 13  BE ALL THINGS  BE GRINEER  seems a bit obvious.
Hai.  *Smiles*
I have to go fight dragons online with my friends.  File it away for the next time I go after you in a cypher. /smooch
lol its people who talk hella shit and say stuff like "if i ever saw you id fuck you or im gonna hack your shit" basically its like saying welcome to the internet.
I would only need a 1gig memory card because Im only interested in keeping save files. I just got it from a friend and it he have one. A 1gig memory card, MediEvil, and Gears for Collision, Muramasa, Zack &amp; Wiki, and Over Lord 2 seems a little low. I saw some other games that interest me but before I list them I thought you might be interested in that I have secret six tpb's and floppies with the authors, Gail Simone's signature one each of them.   Was wondering if those would help me catch up to Metroid or the Racing wheel.
That armory isn't that good... http://imgur.com/a/21nBD Last few pictures.
nobody gives a shit
Dick Holster
I have actually never heard of those!
As for question 2 on account security, Guard Frequency Episode 15 has an interview with John Erskine and they talk about security in some detail.  www.guardfrequency.com/015
the nzxt source 210 is actually 24.50 on Newegg, not 45.  just stating it in case you wanted save like 65 bucks.
Aww, thanks! Don't worry, not creepy.
It was a brief run, but I rarely laugh as much as I did when E&amp;C became Los Conquistadors. They were the best.
He's not invited to my birthday party.
Thanks - I just did. Magicjack doesn't stoop to those levels and tops up your account to your proper expiry date regardless of when you top up .
No, that's not the same at all. And it's less illustrative.   For most of the people that know me, I'm outwardly  gay. I'm sexually and romantically attracted to men. I've only dated men. And in very rare instances, I can be sexually but not romantically attracted to women. Does that make me bisexual? No, so please don't try to police my orientation.
They definitely allow proposals at Blue Jays games, saw one last year. 
Yeah the trailer represents 2 thing in the game. Infiltrators, (not stabbing while invisible though) and Squad beacons... Everything else... nope... that massive scale fight isn't even possible... The only times it was, was when the harasser was good.... That was the only time you could perform stuff as epic was what the LA did in the trailer... Now you can't... Nothing epic can occur really anymore...  Reason number 3? Strategy? MY Petunia's!!! They've been promoting Zerging ever since the lattice system was implemented... Zero strategy is necessarily required, the largest outfits just throw corpses into the meat grinder until it finally jams or runs outta fuel. Number 4 Technically you can, but many who choose not to and only play infantry are for some reason consistently given more and more ways to easily kill the people who choose to fly or drive... And never take into account the balancing that is RESOURCE COSTS and timers....   Night fights aren't rave parties... This article highlights nothing that is actually good about the game...  There are a few things left good about the game. But it seems the devs plan to grind that out too....  Maybe My faith will be restored if they undo the damage they've done to the airgame. and Fix the harasser.  Supposedly they are going to fix the harasser. Probably in the worst way possible... Airgame they have stated nothing about fixing... They continually say OH we're gonna balance these autohit weapons that obviously are OP but never friggin do..
Meh. I don't like her as a judge. I don't buy that she doesn't say shit to be mean sometimes. Give me a break. Saying Alexis Mateo looks like a pinhead behind her back was constructive and necessary? That being said, I don't hate her. It's not that serious. I don't know the woman.
Oh.   Stop drinking alcohol. 
What ?
I only have one celebi :/
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pRiRShIys98 
No, it's not one workout- I do legs mon/wed/fri and push-tuesday, pull-thursday, weekends: 1hour of abs
Donate a sefer torah and you'll see a parade.
IT'S HAPPENING.
Someone care to explain, what the fan (turbine?) is for?
just to letting you guys know  theres a pre-order bonus $10 gift card if you pre-order directly from the Microsoft store! go go go
Our tax system is set up so that high income people primarily pay *the* income tax and lower income people pay the payroll income tax.  So you come along and pretend that it is significant that low income people don't pay *the* income tax.  What the fuck?  They pay the tax that the law says they have to pay.  And the rate that they pay is about the same rate that the super rich pay.  Please explain why it somehow makes sense to you to separate out the taxes and pretend that low income people don't pay their share.  That is just stupid and bizarre.
Just explain to her that you don't have strictly friendly intentions for each other and that it'd be best to cool it on contact until she's single. If you truly want something genuine with this girl then laying foundation while she's in a relationship is not the way to go about doing it. It also shows that you wouldn't condone that behavior while in a relationship with you. To stop now before it goes any further would show great character.
October will be the next time we get 12am Raws...
Ja, framförallt på cheeseburgare
See I played a medic this weekend because the end game raid gear for them I felt looked the coolest. To each their own of course. This is the video btw: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5R_7MZI0_Rc
**Confirmed:** ---------------- You've got it wrong. It takes about $35 to run a credit check on someone. They are just getting reimbursed for the costs they incur.
"Diamonds good. Diamonds shiny and expensive."
Venisti, vidisti auratis accepisti.
Also a lot of people get their snacks and go into their heated car to get home to their heated home. I can see myself getting ice cream for a Friday night.
Also, the reason I asked about the time in between is because if you're drinking tea every night you're not going to trip as hard as the first night, if you even trip at all. 
Gunner pulls it out from time  to time in tna
I think we're smarter. They say we learn more from failures.
Yeah the way he moves is very similar although he's not as strong as D-rose or as explosive but his dribbling and mannerisms are very much like him 
That logo is sweet!
9 hour days, Monday-Friday, with the Friday off every two weeks. I'm on call for the whole time, except for my off-Friday and that weekend.   For being on-call I get standby pay. Standby pay is 0.6 hours per day, with 4.5 hours on the weekend days, adding up to 15 extra hours (at regular time) every two weeks. When I do get called in to fix a problem, it's overtime at 1.5x.
Cheers :D So here it goes! (GOD I HATE US COMMERCIALS)
Because Bo time means Boberry biscuits. Boberry. Bo. Berry. I'm more concerned about that part.
wow.
Sure... Just one? I have 8 cloned.
Do it in the most outrageous fashion possible; then say nothing of it until you suddenly disappear in two weeks.
When Rick headbutted Joe he pulled the trigger as a reflex. 
:D may it bring you great joy!
But it sure was fun!
Hmm, I think I'm imagining this differently than most judging by the comments here. I see a game where you have to get through a lab that runs tests on zombies by giving them portal guns. Would the zombies figure out how to use the portal guns, or would they just shoot it around randomly? Either way, that could be pretty frightening.
They both start off somewhat similar, but the endings are almost entirely different. 
check out boiler room and mix mag lab on youtube
The Arrow wasn't really a fighter jet.  It was more of a supersonic interceptor, in the vein of the MiG-25, or, more accurately and pertinently, the English Electric Lightning (which was a contemporary of the Arrow and offered similar performance with greater range.)
Dear God, the shrieks. 
Gonna out-on-a-limb here and guess that's Flash he's photoshopped on to, but sadly I can't recognize KT players from the shoulders down.
Ok. Haha at first I thought you were telling me that YOU were doing those things. 
They pretty much spelled it out for you when they answered Michonne's question about why they let people in:  "The more people become a part of us, we get stronger.  That's why we put up the signs - invite people in.  It's how we survive."
I read the title as Timmy squared. 
Your atom smasher doesn't need to be big.  Just build a 1x2 bridge, attach a lever, raise the bridge and designate a 1x1 garbage dump under the raised part.  Mark for dump all usless crap (wood items), all bodies and parts, and all ragged clothes and they will pile them in the 1x1 square.  One lever pull and you've regained frame rate.  Works for me all the time.  You can even build it right near your entrance so they don't have to walk so far to dump bodies after a siege.  Just make sure to put the smasher behind a door so a necromancer can't see what's dumped in it.  
granted, Pirlo's Hollywood passes might mask his other lackluster ones. But a fair shout would probably be Carrick, he rarely ever gives the ball away.  edit: I thought Arteta was very solid too last season.  edit2: there are probably a fair few centre backs that rival Busquets in consistency.  edit3: everything I said was true, but lets jerk it to Busquets.
Damn could of fooled me, you'd think I'd see signs of that after 20 some odd years of doing it.  But seriously if you can find me a legit study (not a magazine piece or something) on the dangers of showering twice daily I'll be massively impressed and consider changing my lifestyle.
Opening with Taker? Sweet.
Damn, that's literally the only mafia parody I know of. 
Saying these guys are "in the middle ages" is an insult to the scientific achievements of medieval scholars.  This is stone age mentality.
I like the idea of profiles for apps, however I don't think the notification centre is the place to implement this. Maybe have the profile selector (which I would change from looking like a home button cause that's dam confusing) in the notification center (or maybe on the lock screen?) but I would have the apps from the profile on home screens as normal. NC already lists notications by app, although I do like the idea of being able to filter notifications/only display notifications from a selected app. If the app icons to click were paged however, I think you'd have a good chance of missing important notifications cause they're hidden away.  Finally, I don't think fusion is a relevant name to what this tweak aims to achieve. 
When I was in high school, this kid said he wanted to be a trash man because, and I quote: "they only have to work one day a week."
Your quote was that's it not the parent's business. This is straight up wrong. Everything in the child's life is the parent's business
I'll be back on later after HIMYM ;__;
Aw! No problemo!
Your computer is worth about $400, more if a person is wiling to pay a Mac premium I guess.
Last one I checked out was Super GALs.  I'm in trouble
__^[wow ^so ^verify]__: ^/u/voxic11 ^-&gt; ^/u/SafeSituation __^Ð18.50000000 ^Dogecoin(s)__&amp;nbsp;^__($0.0094102)__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/dogetipbot/wiki/index)
Do you still have the mega blastoise? 
Thats the worst.  Plenty of times I think its my friend but it turns out its a kid with same gear...  Always know backpack color and ask them if they see you
Use [this](http://www.verters.com/vertcoin-hardware-list) as a reference.
I'm ready now. :)
I see him with pulsefire ezreal whenever he gets the chance
New 2nd Network P2Pool Node in Mid-West USA (Ohio)!  http://p2pool.coingiant.net:9172 
se fossero utilizzati come si deve non lo sarebbero. up e down non è "MI PIACE" "NON MI PIACE" ma "È PERTINENTE AL THREAD" "NON LO È". Il concetto sarebbe far salire fisicamente una risposta perché più in linea con la domanda o farla scendere perché poco o niente correlata. Purtroppo facebook ha bruciato le sinapsi a tutti e non lo capiscono. EDIT: ho fatto un bordello coi condizionali EDIT2: non volevo sembrare un maestrino del cavolo, immagino che lo sappiano tutti, volevo solo "ampliare il concetto"
What I said is that if you didn't know ahead of time that experimenting with totalitarianism might lead to millions of deaths, then you'd be more inclined to give it a try, because for all you know it might lead to very good results.  What I didn't say is that people should experiment with totalitarianism despite already somehow knowing that the results would be millions of people dying.  If giving the state absolute authority somehow led not to millions of deaths but to efficiency, prosperity, happiness, security, etc., then it'd be a good idea. But it doesn't, so it's not.
Perhaps Robin will finally make good on her promise to find Ted a girlfriend
For that kind of money, you could've gotten a Tesla.  As a rule, if you have to worry about $475 a month, it's a bad idea. Luxury cars are for people who don't even think about flushing close to half a grand a month on a car. So unless you make six figures and have no financial worries to speak of, you might as well get a *way* cheaper car that's probably going to be the same quality.
Whelp, getting the Dead Man out of the way early, I see. 
Jatt and Imaqtpie... oh how times have changed their looks.
its the top rated post on the subreddit right now...
well, I know for a fact that is too fast/soon. It may be months before she is that comfortable enough with you to take that step. There is alot of trust for someone who isn't sexually free. If she is very conservative when she is ready trust wise, she will also need to feel like it is the right time. Fully showered and expecting the act. BE careful, if you pressure the situation and she gives in. She won't enjoy it and will eventually resent it and you.
If these messages were sent while you were together, the dump him immediately because he's cheating or planning to. If these were beforehand however, it's up to you. If you can't reconcile the fact he's sexually attracted to transsexuals, then you should probably end the relationship, as his sexual preferences probably aren't going to change.   That, or go buy a strap on.
Startin' with dem Gongs
Shit i was hoping more tickets would be released. Wish i didn't miss out on this just so i could see Pusha.
CUZ THIS IS THE SOUTH DAGUMMIT AND YOU GON EARN YER BOBURY BISCUIT SON
how would that be encouraging? concacaf is definitely one of the weaker federations of the bunch. im not trying to hate on him in particular, im just saying playing subpar against subpar opponents has no up side.
Was it as bad as this guy? http://i.imgur.com/k9HOyoL.jpg
About tree fiddy
Probably a bit sore about it.
How is Obama a war criminal exactly?   I agree he has violated our constitutional rights by using drones against american citizens, but that isnt a war crime and I have no problem with the use against non-citizens/enemy combatants.   We have proof bush sanctioned torture, we do not have the same for obama AFAIK.
Drugs don't ruin nearly as many lives as the laws around them do
What's the deal with everyone getting stuff from amazon, I picked up a 64 gb memory card from eBay for £65.50 if I remember correctly the other month. Admittedly it didn't come until afew weeks later because it was from Hong Kong but it's still a lot better pricing 
Psh. Chump change ;)
Eh, not so sure about that.  Jenn Fang decided to analyze the tweet out of context, breaking down the history of the phrases "Orientals" and "Ching Chong", and then deemed the tweet racist. She says "the tweet appears in the absence of the satirical context", but 1) it's from the Colbert Report, so it should automatically be assumed to be a joke, and 2) can't put full context in 140 characters.  Britney Cooper also did the same, saying "Colbert’s bit communicated absurdity but also seemed to suggest that all Asians really do speak this way." Well, if she watched the entire segment, she'd know the line does *not* suggest all Asians speak that way. Her article also smacks of racism, saying that due to Colbert's whiteness, his statements should attract greater scrutiny. She also wonders why black people defend Colbert, as if all black people should think the same, even though she goes on to say "we never get to tell the harmed group what the proper response to racial injury should be".  She does mention that if Colbert used the N word instead, the outrage would be greater, and that's probably true. But, of course, there are folks in high places (Sharpton, Jackson, et al.) and large foundations (NAACP) whose support relies on the eradication of the use of the N-word, regardless of context, especially when used by non-black people.  ------------------------  Really, you can strip Colbert's entire segment down to just "The term 'Redskins' is just as offensive as 'Ching Chong', and here's how". Colbert just used an example employing comedy, and Suey Park and everyone just went nuts.
Woah Taker starts the show. 
FUK U VLADIMIR WHY U EVEN EXIST? (i hate MY TEAMS VLADIMIRS they always suck)
Nah man I was good in the beginning 
eat clen and tren hard. 
I've always wanted Lebron to be a scoring passer, meaning open up open shots by personally dominating whenever you're on the floor. It's too often that he settles for skipping passes on the perimeter.
